 _Chapter 3_
 The Ring Goes South
 Later that day the hobbits held a meeting of their own in Bilbo's room.
Merry and Pippin were indignant when they heard that Sam had crept into the
Council, and had been chosen as Frodo's companion.
 `It's most unfair,' said Pippin. `Instead of throwing him out, and
clapping him in chains, Elrond goes and rewards him for his cheek!'
 `Rewards!' said Frodo. 'I can't imagine a more severe punishment. You are
not thinking what you are saying: condemned to go on this hopeless journey, a
reward? Yesterday I dreamed that my task was done, and I could rest here, a
long while, perhaps for good.'
 'I don't wonder,' said Merry, 'and I wish you could. But we are envying
Sam, not you. If you have to go, then it will be a punishment for any of us to
be left behind, even in Rivendell. We have come a long way with you and been
through some stiff times. We want to go on.'
 `That's what I meant,' said Pippin. `We hobbits ought to stick together,
and we will. I shall go, unless they chain me up. There must be someone with
intelligence in the party.'
 'Then you certainly will not be chosen, Peregrin Took!' said Gandalf,
looking in through the window, which was near the ground. `But you are all
worrying yourselves unnecessarily. Nothing is decided yet.'
 `Nothing decided!' cried Pippin. 'Then what were you all doing? You were
shut up for hours.'
 "Talking,' said Bilbo. `There was a deal of talk, and everyone had an
eye-opener. Even old Gandalf. I think Legolas's bit of news about Gollum
caught even him on the hop, though he passed it off.'
 `You were wrong,' said Gandalf. 'You were inattentive. I had already
heard of it from Gwaihir. If you want to know, the only real eye-openers, as
you put it, were you and Frodo; and I was the only one that was not
surprised.'
 `Well, anyway,' said Bilbo, 'nothing was decided beyond choosing poor
Frodo and Sam. I was afraid all the time that it might come to that, if I was
let off. But if you ask me, Elrond will send out a fair number, when the
reports come in. Have they started yet, Gandalf?'
 'Yes,' said the wizard. `Some of the scouts have been sent out already.
More will go tomorrow. Elrond is sending Elves, and they will get in touch
with the Rangers, and maybe with Thranduil's folk in Mirkwood. And Aragorn has
gone with Elrond's sons. We shall have to scour the lands all round for many
long leagues before any move is made. So cheer up, Frodo! You will probably
make quite a long stay here.'
 'Ah!' said Sam gloomily. 'We'll just wait long enough for winter to
come.'
 'That can't be helped,' said Bilbo. 'It's your fault partly, Frodo my
lad: insisting on waiting for my birthday. A funny way of honouring it, I
can't help thinking. Not the day I should have chosen for letting the S.-B.s
into Bag End. But there it is: you can't wait now fill spring; and you can't
go till the reports come back.
 When winter first begins to bite
 and stones crack in the frosty night,
 when pools are black and trees are bare,
 'tis evil in the Wild to fare.
 But that I am afraid will be just your luck.'
 'I am afraid it will,' said Gandalf. 'We can't start until we have found
out about the Riders.'
 `I thought they were all destroyed in the flood,' said Merry.
 'You cannot destroy Ringwraiths like that,' said Gandalf. `The power of
their master is in them, and they stand or fall by him. We hope that they were
all unhorsed and unmasked, and so made for a while less dangerous; but we must
find out for certain. In the meantime you should try and forget your troubles,
Frodo. I do not know if I can do anything to help you; but I will whisper this
in your ears. Someone said that intelligence would be needed in the party. He
was right. I think I shall come with you.'
 So great was Frodo's delight at this announcement that Gandalf left the
window-sill, where he had been sitting, and took off his hat and bowed. 'I
only said _I think I shall come_. Do not count on anything yet. In this matter
Elrond will have much to say, and your friend the Strider. Which reminds me, I
want to see Elrond. I must be off.'
 `How long do you think I shall have here?' said Frodo to Bilbo when
Gandalf had gone.
 `Oh, I don't know. I can't count days in Rivendell,' said Bilbo. 'But
quite long, I should think. We can have many a good talk. What about helping
me with my book, and making a start on the next? Have you thought of an
ending?'
 'Yes, several, and all are dark and unpleasant,' said Frodo.
 'Oh, that won't do!' said Bilbo. `Books ought to have good endings. How
would this do: _and they all settled down and lived together happily ever
after_?'
 `It will do well, if it ever comes to that,' said Frodo.
 'Ah!' said Sam. 'And where will they live? That's what I often wonder.'
 For a while the hobbits continued to talk and think of the past journey
and of the perils that lay ahead; but such was the virtue of the land of
Rivendell that soon all fear and anxiety was lifted from their minds. The
future, good or ill, was not forgotten, but ceased to have any power over the
present. Health and hope grew strong in them, and they were content with each
good day as it came, taking pleasure in every meal, and in every word and
song.
 So the days slipped away, as each morning dawned bright and fair, and
each evening followed cool and clear. But autumn was waning fast; slowly the
golden light faded to pale silver, and the lingering leaves fell from the
naked trees. A wind began to blow chill from the Misty Mountains to the east.
The Hunter's Moon waxed round in the night sky, and put to flight all the
lesser stars. But low in the South one star shone red. Every night, as the
Moon waned again, it shone brighter and brighter. Frodo could see it from his
window, deep in the heavens burning like a watchful eye that glared above the
trees on the brink of the valley.
 The hobbits had been nearly two months in the House of Elrond, and
November had gone by with the last shreds of autumn, and December was passing,
when the scouts began to return. Some had gone north beyond the springs of the
Hoarwell into the Ettenmoors; and others had gone west, and with the help of
Aragorn and the Rangers had searched the lands far down the Greyflood, as far
as Tharbad, where the old North Road crossed the river by a ruined town. Many
had gone east and south; and some of these had crossed the Mountains and
entered Mirkwood, while others had climbed the pass at the source of the
Gladden River, and had come down into Wilderland and over the Gladden Fields
and so at length had reached the old home of Radagast at Rhosgobel. Radagast
was not there; and they had returned over the high pass that was called the
Dimrill Stair. The sons of Elrond, Elladan and Elrohir, were the last to
return; they had made a great journey, passing down the Silverlode into a
strange country, but of their errand they would not speak to any save to
Elrond.
 In no region had the messengers discovered any signs or tidings of the
Riders or other servants of the Enemy. Even from the Eagles of the Misty
Mountains they had learned no fresh news. Nothing had been seen or heard of
Gollum; but the wild wolves were still gathering, and were hunting again far
up the Great River. Three of the black horses had been found at once drowned
in the flooded Ford. On the rocks of the rapids below it searchers discovered
the bodies of five more, and also a long black cloak, slashed and tattered. Of
the Black Riders no other trace was to be seen, and nowhere was their presence
to be felt. It seemed that they had vanished from the North.
 'Eight out of the Nine are accounted for at least,' said Gandalf. 'It is
rash to be too sure, yet I think that we may hope now that the Ringwraiths
were scattered, and have been obliged to return as best they could to their
Master in Mordor, empty and shapeless.
 `If that is so, it will be some time before they can begin the hunt
again. Of course the Enemy has other servants, but they will have to journey
all the way to the borders of Rivendell before they can pick up our trail. And
if we are careful that will be hard to find. But we must delay no longer.'
 Elrond summoned the hobbits to him. He looked gravely at Frodo. 'The time
has come,' he said. `If the Ring is to set out, it must go soon. But those who
go with it must not count on their errand being aided by war or force. They
must pass into the domain of the Enemy far from aid. Do you still hold to your
word, Frodo, that you will be the Ring-bearer?'
 'I do,' said Frodo. `I will go with Sam.'
 `Then I cannot help you much, not even with counsel,' said Elrond. `I can
foresee very little of your road; and how your task is to be achieved I do not
know. The Shadow has crept now to the feet of the Mountains, and draws nigh
even to the borders of Greyflood; and under the Shadow all is dark to me. You
will meet many foes, some open, and some disguised; and you may find friends
upon your way when you least look for it. I will send out messages, such as I
can contrive, to those whom I know in the wide world; but so perilous are the
lands now become that some may well miscarry, or come no quicker than you
yourself.
 `And I will choose you companions to go with you, as far as they will or
fortune allows. The number must be few, since your hope is in speed and
secrecy. Had I a host of Elves in armour of the Elder Days, it would avail
little, save to arouse the power of Mordor.
 `The Company of the Ring shall be Nine; and the Nine Walkers shall be set
against the Nine Riders that are evil. With you and your faithful servant,
Gandalf will go; for this shall be his great task, and maybe the end of his
labours.
 `For the rest, they shall represent the other Free Peoples of the World:
Elves, Dwarves, and Men. Legolas shall be for the Elves; and Gimli son of
Glóin for the Dwarves. They are willing to go at least to the passes of the
Mountains, and maybe beyond. For men you shall have Aragorn son of Arathorn,
for the Ring of Isildur concerns him closely.'
 `Strider!' said Frodo.
 'Yes,' he said with a smile. `I ask leave once again to be your
companion, Frodo.'
 `I would have begged you to come,' said Frodo, 'only I thought you were
going to Minas Tirith with Boromir.'
 `I am,' said Aragorn. `And the Sword-that-was-Broken shall be reforged
ere I set out to war. But your road and our road lie together for many
hundreds of miles. Therefore Boromir will also be in the Company. He is a
valiant man.'
 'There remain two more to be found,' said Elrond. "These I will consider.
Of my household I may find some that it seems good to me to send.'
 `But that will leave no place for us!' cried Pippin in dismay. `We don't
want to be left behind. We want to go with Frodo.'
 `That is because you do not understand and cannot imagine what lies
ahead,' said Elrond.
 `Neither does Frodo,' said Gandalf, unexpectedly supporting Pippin. 'Nor
do any of us see clearly. It is true that if these hobbits understood the
danger, they would not dare to go. But they would still wish to go, or wish
that they dared, and be shamed and unhappy. I think, Elrond, that in this
matter it would be well to trust rather to their friendship than to great
wisdom. Even if you chose for us an elf-lord, such as Glorfindel, he could not
storm the Dark Tower, nor open the road to the Fire by the power that is in
him.'
 `You speak gravely,' said Elrond, `but I am in doubt. The Shire, I
forebode, is not free now from peril; and these two I had thought to send back
there as messengers, to do what they could, according to the fashion of their
country, to warn the people of their danger. In any case, I judge that the
younger of these two, Peregrin Took, should remain. My heart is against his
going.'
 `Then, Master Elrond, you will have to lock me in prison, or send me home
tied in a sack,' said Pippin. `For otherwise I shall follow the Company.'
 `Let it be so then. You shall go,' said Elrond, and he sighed. 'Now the
tale of Nine is filled. In seven days the Company must depart.'
 The Sword of Elendil was forged anew by Elvish smiths, and on its blade
was traced a device of seven stars set between the crescent Moon and the rayed
Sun, and about them was written many runes; for Aragorn son of Arathorn was
going to war upon the marches of Mordor. Very bright was that sword when it
was made whole again; the light of the sun shone redly in it, and the light of
the moon shone cold, and its edge was hard and keen. And Aragorn gave it a new
name and called it Andúril, Flame of the West.
 Aragorn and Gandalf walked together or sat speaking of their road and the
perils they would meet; and they pondered the storied and figured maps and
books of lore that were in the house of Elrond. Sometimes Frodo was with them;
but he was content to lean on their guidance, and he spent as much time as he
could with Bilbo.
 In those last days the hobbits sat together in the evening in the Hall of
Fire, and there among many tales they heard told in full the lay of Beren and
Lúthien and the winning of the Great Jewel; but in the day, while Merry and
Pippin were out and about, Frodo and Sam were to be found with Bilbo in his
own small room. Then Bilbo would read passages from his book (which still
seemed very incomplete). or scraps of his verses, or would take notes of
Frodo's adventures.
 On the morning of the last day Frodo was alone with Bilbo, and the old
hobbit pulled out from under his bed a wooden box. He lifted the lid and
fumbled inside.
 'Here is your sword,' he said. 'But it was broken, you know. I took it to
keep it safe but I've forgotten to ask if the smiths could mend it. No time
now.. So I thought, perhaps, you would care to have this, don't you know?'
 He took from the box a small sword in an old shabby leathern scabbard.
Then he drew it, and its polished and well-tended blade glittered suddenly,
cold and bright. 'This is Sting,' he said, and thrust it with little effort
deep into a wooden beam. `Take it, if you like. I shan't want it again, I
expect.'
 Frodo accepted it gratefully.
 'Also there is this!' said Bilbo, bringing out a parcel which seemed to
be rather heavy for its size. He unwound several folds of old cloth, and held
up a small shirt of mail. It was close-woven of many rings, as supple almost
as linen, cold as ice, and harder than steel. It shone like moonlit silver,
and was studded with white gems. With it was a belt of pearl and crystal.
 'It's a pretty thing, isn't it?' said Bilbo, moving it in the light. `And
useful. It is my dwarf-mail that Thorin gave me. I got it back from Michel
Delving before I started, and packed it with my luggage: I brought all the
mementoes of my Journey away with me, except the Ring. But I did not expect to
use this, and I don't need it now, except to look at sometimes. You hardly
feel any weight when you put it on.'
 `I should look – well, I don't think I should look right in it,' said
Frodo.
 `Just what I said myself,' said Bilbo. 'But never mind about looks. You
can wear it under your outer clothes. Come on! You must share this secret with
me. Don't tell anybody else! But I should feel happier if I knew you were
wearing it. I have a fancy it would turn even the knives of the Black
Riders,' he ended in a low voice.
 `Very well, I will take it,' said Frodo. Bilbo put it on him, and
fastened Sting upon the glittering belt; and then Frodo put over the top his
old weather-stained breeches, tunic, and jacket.
 'Just a plain hobbit you look,' said Bilbo. 'But there is more about you
now than appears on the surface. Good luck to you!' He turned away and looked
out of the window, trying to hum a tune.
 'I cannot thank you as I should, Bilbo, for this, and for all our past
kindnesses,' said Frodo.
 'Don't try!' said the old hobbit, turning round and slapping him on the
back. `Ow!' he cried. `You are too hard now to slap! But there you are:
Hobbits must stick together, and especially Bagginses. All I ask in return is:
take as much care of yourself as you can. and bring back all the news you can,
and any old songs and tales you can come by. I'll do my best to finish my book
before you return. I should like to write the second book, if I am spared.' He
broke off and turned to the window again, singing softly.
 I sit beside the fire and think
 of all that I have seen,
 of meadow-flowers and butterflies
 in summers that have been;
 Of yellow leaves and gossamer
 in autumns that there were,
 with morning mist and silver sun
 and wind upon my hair.
 I sit beside the fire and think
 of how the world will be
 when winter comes without a spring
 that I shall ever see.
 For still there are so many things
 that I have never seen:
 in every wood in every spring
 there is a different green.
 I sit beside the fire and think
 of people long ago,
 and people who will see a world
 that I shall never know.
 But all the while I sit and think
 of times there were before,
 I listen for returning feet
 and voices at the door.
 It was a cold grey day near the end of December. The East Wind was
streaming through the bare branches of the trees, and seething in the dark
pines on the hills. Ragged clouds were hurrying overhead, dark and low. As the
cheerless shadows of the early evening began to fall the Company made ready to
set out. They were to start at dusk, for Elrond counselled them to journey
under cover of night as often as they could, until they were far from
Rivendell.
 `You should fear the many eyes of the servants of Sauron,' he said. 'I do
not doubt that news of the discomfiture of the Riders has already reached him,
and he will be filled with wrath. Soon now his spies on foot and wing will be
abroad in the northern lands. Even of the sky above you must beware as you go
on your way.'
 The Company took little gear of war, for their hope was in secrecy not in
battle. Aragorn had Andúril but no other weapon, and he went forth clad only
in rusty green and brown. as a Ranger of the wilderness. Boromir had a long
sword, in fashion like Andúril but of less lineage and he bore also a shield
and his war-horn.
 'Loud and clear it sounds in the valleys of the hills,' he said, `and
then let all the foes of Gondor flee!' Putting it to his lips he blew a blast,
and the echoes leapt from rock to rock, and all that heard that voice in
Rivendell sprang to their feet.
 Slow should you be to wind that horn again, Boromir, said Elrond. 'until
you stand once more on the borders of your land, and dire need is on you.'
 `Maybe,' said Boromir. 'But always I have let my horn cry at setting
forth, and though thereafter we may walk in the shadows, I will not go forth
as a thief in the night.'
 Gimli the dwarf alone wore openly a short shirt of steel-rings, for
dwarves make light of burdens; and in his belt was a broad-bladed axe. Legolas
had a bow and a quiver, and at his belt a long white knife. The younger
hobbits wore the swords that they had taken from the barrow; but Frodo took
only Sting; and his mail-coat, as Bilbo wished, remained hidden. Gandalf bore
his staff, but girt at his side was the elven-sword Glamdring, the mate of
Orcrist that lay now upon the breast of Thorin under the Lonely Mountain.
 All were well furnished by Elrond with thick warm clothes, and they had
jackets and cloaks lined with fur. Spare food and clothes and blankets and
other needs were laden on a pony, none other than the poor beast that they had
brought from Bree.
 ?he stay in Rivendell had worked a great wonder of change on him: he was
glossy and seemed to have the vigour of youth. It was Sam who had insisted on
choosing him, declaring that Bill (as he called him) would pine, if he did not
come.
 `That animal can nearly talk,' he said, `and would talk, if he stayed
here much longer. He gave me a look as plain as Mr. Pippin could speak it: if
you don't let me go with you, Sam, I'll follow on my own.' So Bill was going
as the beast of burden, yet he was the only member of the Company that did not
seem depressed.
 Their farewells had been said in the great hall by the fire, and they
were only waiting now for Gandalf, who had not yet come out of the house. A
gleam of firelight came from the open doors, and soft lights were glowing in
many windows. Bilbo huddled in a cloak stood silent on the doorstep beside
Frodo. Aragorn sat with his head bowed to his knees; only Elrond knew fully
what this hour meant to him. The others could be seen as grey shapes in the
darkness.
 Sam was standing by the pony, sucking his teeth, and staring moodily into
the gloom where the river roared stonily below; his desire for adventure was
at its lowest ebb.
 `Bill, my lad,' he said, `you oughtn't to have took up with us. You could
have stayed here and et the best hay till the new grass comes.' Bill swished
his tail and said nothing.
 Sam eased the pack on his shoulders, and went over anxiously in his mind
all the things that he had stowed in it, wondering if he had forgotten
anything: his chief treasure, his cooking gear; and the little box of salt
that he always carried and refilled when he could; a good supply of pipe-weed
(but not near enough, I'll warrant); flint and tinder; woollen hose: linen;
various small belongings of his master's that Frodo had forgotten and Sam had
stowed to bring them out in triumph when they were called for. He went through
them all.
 'Rope!' he muttered. `No rope! And only last night you said to yourself:
"Sam, what about a bit of rope? You'll want it, if you haven't got it:" Well,
I'll want it. I can't get it now.'
 At that moment Elrond came out with Gandalf, and he called the Company to
him. 'This is my last word,' he said in a low voice. 'The Ring-bearer is
setting out on the Quest of Mount Doom. On him alone is any charge laid:
neither to cast away the Ring, nor to deliver it to any servant of the Enemy
nor indeed to let any handle it, save members of the Company and the Council,
and only then in gravest need. The others go with him as free companions, to
help him on his way. You may tarry, or come back, or turn aside into other
paths, as chance allows. The further you go, the less easy will it be to
withdraw; yet no oath or bond is laid on you to go further than you will. For
you do not yet know the strength of your hearts, and you cannot foresee what
each may meet upon the road.'
 `Faithless is he that says farewell when the road darkens,' said Gimli.
 'Maybe,' said Elrond, `but let him not vow to walk in the dark, who has
not seen the nightfall.'
 'Yet sworn word may strengthen quaking heart,' said Gimli.
 `Or break it,' said Elrond. `Look not too far ahead! But go now with good
hearts! Farewell, and may the blessing of Elves and Men and all Free Folk go
with you. May the stars shine upon your faces!'
 'Good . . . good luck!' cried Bilbo, stuttering with the cold. 'I don't
suppose you will be able to keep a diary, Frodo my lad, but I shall expect a
full account when you get back. And don't be too long! Farewell!'
 Many others of Elrond's household stood in the shadows and watched them
go, bidding them farewell with soft voices. There was no laughter, and no song
or music. At last they turned away and faded silently into the dusk.
 They crossed the bridge and wound slowly up the long steep paths that led
out of the cloven vale of Rivendell; and they came at length to the high moor
where the wind hissed through the heather. Then with one glance at the Last
Homely House twinkling below them they strode away far into the night.
 At the Ford of Bruinen they left the Road and turning southwards went on
by narrow paths among the folded lands. Their purpose was to hold this course
west of the Mountains for many miles and days. The country was much rougher
and more barren than in the green vale of the Great River in Wilderland on the
other side of the range, and their going would be slow; but they hoped in this
way to escape the notice of unfriendly eyes. The spies of Sauron had hitherto
seldom been seen in this empty country, and the paths were little known except
to the people of Rivendell.
 Gandalf walked in front, and with him went Aragorn, who knew this land
even in the dark. The others were in file behind, and Legolas whose eyes were
keen was the rearguard. The first part of their journey was hard and dreary,
and Frodo remembered little of it, save the wind. For many sunless days an icy
blast came from the Mountains in the east, and no garment seemed able to keep
out its searching fingers. Though the Company was well clad, they seldom felt
warm, either moving or at rest. They slept uneasily during the middle of the
day, in some hollow of the land, or hidden under the tangled thorn-bushes that
grew in thickets in many places. In the late afternoon they were roused by the
watch, and took their chief meal: cold and cheerless as a rule, for they could
seldom risk the lighting of a fire. In the evening they went on again, always
as nearly southward as they could find a way.
 At first it seemed to the hobbits that although they walked and stumbled
until they were weary, they were creeping forward like snails, and getting
nowhere. Each day the land looked much the same as it had the day before. Yet
steadily the mountains were drawing nearer. South of Rivendell they rose ever
higher, and bent westwards; and about the feet of the main range there was
tumbled an ever wider land of bleak hills, and deep valleys filled with
turbulent waters. Paths were few and winding, and led them often only to the
edge of some sheer fall, or down into treacherous swamps.
 They had been a fortnight on the way when the weather changed. The wind
suddenly fell and then veered round to the south. The swift-flowing clouds
lifted and melted away, and the sun came out, pale and bright. There came a
cold clear dawn at the end of a long stumbling night-march. The travellers
reached a low ridge crowned with ancient holly-trees whose grey-green trunks
seemed to have been built out of the very stone of the hills. Their dark
leaves shone and their berries glowed red in the light of the rising sun.
 Away in the south Frodo could see the dim shapes of lofty mountains that
seemed now to stand across the path that the Company was taking. At the left
of this high range rose three peaks; the tallest and nearest stood up like a
tooth tipped with snow; its great, bare, northern precipice was still largely
in the shadow, but where the sunlight slanted upon it, it glowed red.
 Gandalf stood at Frodo's side and looked out under his hand. `We have
done well,' he said. `We have reached the borders of the country that Men call
Hollin; many Elves lived here in happier days, when Eregion was its name.
Five-and-forty leagues as the crow flies we have come, though many long miles
further our feet have walked. The land and the weather will be milder now, but
perhaps all the more dangerous.'
 `Dangerous or not, a real sunrise is mighty welcome,' said Frodo,
throwing back his hood and letting the morning light fall on his face.
 'But the mountains are ahead of us,' said Pippin. `We must have turned
eastwards in the night.'
 'No,' said Gandalf. 'But you see further ahead in the clear light. Beyond
those peaks the range bends round south-west. There are many maps in Elrond's
house, but I suppose you never thought to look at them?'
 `Yes I did, sometimes,' said Pippin, `but I don't remember them. Frodo
has a better head for that sort of thing.'
 `I need no map,' said Gimli, who had come up with Legolas, and was gazing
out before him with a strange light in his deep eyes. `There is the land where
our fathers worked of old, and we have wrought the image of those mountains
into many works of metal and of stone, and into many songs and tales. They
stand tall in our dreams: Baraz, Zirak, Shathûr.
 `Only once before have I seen them from afar in waking life, but I know
them and their names, for under them lies Khazad-dûm, the Dwarrowdelf, that is
now called the Black Pit, Moria in the Elvish tongue. Yonder stands
Barazinbar, the Redhorn, cruel Caradhras; and beyond him are Silvertine and
Cloudyhead: Celebdil the White, and Fanuidhol the Grey, that we call Zirakzigil and Bundushathûr.
 `There the Misty Mountains divide, and between their arms lies the deepshadowed valley which we
cannot forget: Azanulbizar, the Dimrill Dale, which
the Elves call Nanduhirion.'
 `It is for the Dimrill Dale that we are making,' said Gandalf. `If we
climb the pass that is called the Redhorn Gate, under the far side of
Caradhras, we shall come down by the Dimrill Stair into the deep vale of the
Dwarves. There lies the Mirrormere, and there the River Silverlode rises in
its icy springs.'
 `Dark is the water of Kheled-zâram,' said Gimli, `and cold are the
springs of Kibil-nâla. My heart trembles at the thought that I may see them
soon.'
 `May you have joy of the sight, my good dwarf l' said Gandalf. 'But
whatever you may do, we at least cannot stay in that valley. We must go down
the Silverlode into the secret woods, and so to the Great River, and then -'
 He paused.
 'Yes, and where then?' asked Merry.
 'To the end of the journey – in the end,' said Gandalf. 'We cannot look
too far ahead. Let us be glad that the first stage is safely over. I think we
will rest here, not only today but tonight as well. There is a wholesome air
about Hollin. Much evil must befall a country before it wholly forgets the
Elves, if once they dwelt there.'
 'That is true,' said Legolas. `But the Elves of this land were of a race
strange to us of the silvan folk, and the trees and the grass do not now
remember them: Only I hear the stones lament them: _deep they delved us, fair
they wrought us, high they builded us; but they are gone_. They are gone. They
sought the Havens long ago.'
 That morning they lit a fire in a deep hollow shrouded by great bushes of
holly, and their supper-breakfast was merrier than it had been since they set
out. They did not hurry to bed afterwards, for they expected to have all the
night to sleep in, and they did not mean to go on again until the evening of
the next day. Only Aragorn was silent and restless. After a while he left the
Company and wandered on to the ridge; there he stood in the shadow of a tree,
looking out southwards and westwards, with his head posed as if he was
listening. Then he returned to the brink of the dell and looked down at the
others laughing and talking.
 `What is the matter, Strider?' Merry called up. 'What are you looking
for? Do you miss the East Wind?'
 'No indeed,' he answered. `But I miss something. I have been in the
country of Hollin in many seasons. No folk dwell here now, but many other
creatures live here at all times, especially birds. Yet now all things but you
are silent. I can feel it. There is no sound for miles about us, and your
voices seem to make the ground echo. I do not understand it.'
 Gandalf looked up with sudden interest. `But what do you guess is the
reason?' he asked. `Is there more in it than surprise at seeing four hobbits,
not to mention the rest of us, where people are so seldom seen or heard?'
 `I hope that is it,' answered Aragorn. `But I have a sense of
watchfulness, and of fear, that I have never had here before.'
 "Then we must be more careful,' said Gandalf. 'If you bring a Ranger with
you, it is well to pay attention to him, especially if the Ranger is Aragorn.
We must stop talking aloud, rest quietly, and set the watch.'
 It was Sam's turn that day to take the first watch, but Aragorn joined
him. The others fell asleep. Then the silence grew until even Sam felt it. The
breathing of the sleepers could be plainly heard. The swish of the pony's tail
and the occasional movements of his feet became loud noises. Sam could hear
his own joints creaking, if he stirred. Dead silence was around him, and over
all hung a clear blue sky, as the Sun rode up from the East. Away in the South
a dark patch appeared, and grew, and drove north like flying smoke in the
wind.
 `What's that, Strider? It don't look like a cloud,' said Sam in a whisper
to Aragorn. He made no answer, he was gazing intently at the sky; but before
long Sam could see for himself what was approaching. Flocks of birds, flying
at great speed, were wheeling and circling, and traversing all the land as if
they were searching for something; and they were steadily drawing nearer.
 `Lie flat and still!' hissed Aragorn, pulling Sam down into the shade of
a holly-bush; for a whole regiment of birds had broken away suddenly from the
main host, and came, flying low, straight towards the ridge. Sam thought they
were a kind of crow of large size. As they passed overhead, in so dense a
throng that their shadow followed them darkly over the ground below, one harsh
croak was heard.
 Not until they had dwindled into the distance, north and west, and the
sky was again clear would Aragorn rise. Then he sprang up and went and wakened
Gandalf.
 `Regiments of black crows are flying over all the land between the
Mountains and the Greyflood,' he said, `and they have passed over Hollin. They
are not natives here; they are _crebain_ out of Fangorn and Dunland. I do not
know what they are about: possibly there is some trouble away south from which
they are fleeing; but I think they are spying out the land. I have also
glimpsed many hawks flying high up in the sky. I think we ought to move again
this evening. Hollin is no longer wholesome for us: it is being watched.'
 `And in that case so is the Redhorn Gate,' said Gandalf; `and how we can
get over that without being seen, I cannot imagine. But we will think of that
when we must. As for moving as soon as it is dark, I am afraid that you are
right.'
 `Luckily our fire made little smoke, and had burned low before the
_crebain_ came,' said Aragorn. `It must be put out and not lit again.'
 `Well if that isn't a plague and a nuisance!' said Pippin. The news: no
fire, and a move again by night, had been broken to him, as soon as he woke in
the late afternoon. 'All because of a pack of crows! I had looked forward to a
real good meal tonight: something hot.'
 `Well, you can go on looking forward,' said Gandalf. `There may be many
unexpected feasts ahead for you. For myself I should like a pipe to smoke in
comfort, and warmer feet. However, we are certain of one thing at any rate: it
will get warmer as we get south.'
 'Too warm, I shouldn't wonder,' muttered Sam to Frodo. 'But I'm beginning
to think it's time we got a sight of that Fiery Mountain and saw the end of
the Road, so to speak. I thought at first that this here Redhorn, or whatever
its name is, might be it, till Gimli spoke his piece. A fair jaw-cracker
dwarf-language must be!' Maps conveyed nothing to Sam's mind, and all
distances in these strange lands seemed so vast that he was quite out of his
reckoning.
 All that day the Company remained in hiding. The dark birds passed over
now and again; but as the westering Sun grew red they disappeared southwards.
At dusk the Company set out, and turning now half east they steered their
course towards Caradhras, which far away still glowed faintly red in the last
light of the vanished Sun. One by one white stars sprang forth as the sky
faded.
 Guided by Aragorn they struck a good path. It looked to Frodo like the
remains of an ancient road, that had once been broad and well planned, from
Hollin to the mountain-pass. The Moon, now at the full, rose over the
mountains, and cast a pale light in which the shadows of stones were black.
Many of them looked to have been worked by hands, though now they lay tumbled
and ruinous in a bleak, barren land.
 It was the cold chill hour before the first stir of dawn, and the moon
was low. Frodo looked up at the sky. Suddenly he saw or felt a shadow pass
over the high stars, as if for a moment they faded and then flashed out again.
He shivered.
 `Did you see anything pass over?' he whispered to Gandalf, who was just
ahead.
 `No, but I felt it, whatever it was,' he answered. `It may be nothing,
only a wisp of thin cloud.'
 `It was moving fast then,' muttered Aragorn, `and not with the wind.'
 Nothing further happened that night. The next morning dawned even
brighter than before. But the air was chill again; already the wind was
turning back towards the east. For two more nights they marched on, climbing
steadily but ever more slowly as their road wound up into the hills, and the
mountains towered up, nearer and nearer. On the third morning Caradhras rose
before them, a mighty peak, tipped with snow like silver, but with sheer naked
sides, dull red as if stained with blood.
 There was a black look in the sky, and the sun was wan. The wind had gone
now round to the north-east. Gandalf snuffed the air and looked back.
 `Winter deepens behind us,' he said quietly to Aragorn. 'The heights away
north are whiter than they were; snow is lying far down their shoulders.
Tonight we shall be on our way high up towards the Redhorn Gate. We may well
be seen by watchers on that narrow path, and waylaid by some evil; but the
weather may prove a more deadly enemy than any. What do you think of your
course now, Aragorn?'
 Frodo overheard these words, and understood that Gandalf and Aragorn were
continuing some debate that had begun long before. He listened anxiously.
 'I think no good of our course from beginning to end, as you know well,
Gandalf,' answered Aragorn. `And perils known and unknown will grow as we go
on. But we must go on; and it is no good our delaying the passage of the
mountains. Further south there are no passes, till one comes to the Gap of
Rohan. I do not trust that way since your news of Saruman. Who knows which
side now the marshals of the Horse-lords serve?'
 'Who knows indeed!' said Gandalf. `But there is another way, and not by
the pass of Caradhras: the dark and secret way that we have spoken of.'
 'But let us not speak of it again! Not yet. Say nothing to the others I
beg, not until it is plain that there is no other way.'
 'We must decide before we go further,' answered Gandalf.
 'Then let us weigh the matter in our minds, while the others rest and
sleep,' said Aragorn.
 In the late afternoon, while the others were finishing their breakfast,
Gandalf and Aragorn went aside together and stood looking at Caradhras. Its
sides were now dark and sullen, and its head was in grey cloud. Frodo watched
them, wondering which way the debate would go. When they returned to the
Company Gandalf spoke, and then he knew that it had been decided to face the
weather and the high pass. He was relieved. He could not guess what was the
other dark and secret way, but the very mention of it had seemed to fill
Aragorn with dismay, and Frodo was glad that it had been abandoned.
 `From signs that we have seen lately,' said Gandalf, 'I fear that the
Redhorn Gate may be watched; and also I have doubts of the weather that is
coming up behind. Snow may come. We must go with all the speed that we can.
Even so it will take us more than two marches before we reach the top of the
pass. Dark will come early this evening. We must leave as soon as you can get
ready.'
 'I will add a word of advice, if I may,' said Boromir. 'I was born under
the shadow of the White Mountains and know something of journeys in the high
places. We shall meet bitter cold, if no worse, before we come down on the
other side. It will not help us to keep so secret that we are frozen to death.
When we leave here, where there are still a few trees and bushes, each of us
should carry a faggot of wood, as large as he can bear.'
 'And Bill could take a bit more, couldn't you lad?' said Sam. The pony
looked at him mournfully.
 'Very well,' said Gandalf. `But we must not use the wood – not unless it
is a choice between fire and death.'
 The Company set out again with good speed at first; but soon their way
became steep and difficult. The twisting and climbing road had in many places
almost disappeared, and was blocked with many fallen stones. The night grew
deadly dark under great clouds. A bitter wind swirled among the rocks. By
midnight they had climbed to the knees of the great mountains. The narrow path
now wound under a sheer wall of cliffs to the left, above which the grim
flanks of Caradhras towered up invisible in the gloom; on the right was a gulf
of darkness where the land fell suddenly into a deep ravine.
 Laboriously they climbed a sharp slope and halted for a moment at the
top. Frodo felt a soft touch on his face. He put out his arm and saw the dim
white flakes of snow settling on his sleeve.
 They went on. But before long the snow was falling fast, filling all the
air, and swirling into Frodo's eyes. The dark bent shapes of Gandalf and
Aragorn only a pace or two ahead could hardly be seen.
 'I don't like this at all,' panted Sam just behind. 'Snow's all right on
a fine morning, but I like to be in bed while it's falling. I wish this lot
would go off to Hobbiton! Folk might welcome it there.' Except on the high
moors of the Northfarthing a heavy fall was rare in the Shire, and was
regarded as a pleasant event and a chance for fun. No living hobbit (save
Bilbo) could remember the Fell Winter of 1311, when the white wolves invaded
the Shire over the frozen Brandywine.
 Gandalf halted. Snow was thick on his hood and shoulders; it was already
ankle-deep about his boots.
 "This is what I feared,' he said. `What do you say now, Aragorn?'
 'That I feared it too,' Aragorn answered, `but less than other things. I
knew the risk of snow, though it seldom falls heavily so far south, save high
up in the mountains. But we are not high yet; we are still far down, where the
paths are usually open all the winter.'
'I wonder if this is a contrivance of the Enemy,' said Boromir. "They say
in my land that he can govern the storms in the Mountains of Shadow that stand
upon the borders of Mordor. He has strange powers and many allies.'
 'His arm has grown long indeed,' said Gimli, `if he can draw snow down
from the North to trouble us here three hundred leagues away.'
 'His arm has grown long,' said Gandalf.
 While they were halted, the wind died down, and the snow slackened until
it almost ceased. They tramped on again. But they had not gone more than a
furlong when the storm returned with fresh fury. The wind whistled and the
snow became a blinding blizzard. Soon even Boromir found it hard to keep
going. The hobbits, bent nearly double, toiled along behind the taller folk,
but it was plain that they could not go much further, if the snow continued.
Frodo's feet felt like lead. Pippin was dragging behind. Even Gimli, as stout
as any dwarf could be, was grumbling as he trudged.
 The Company halted suddenly, as if they had come to an agreement without
any words being spoken. They heard eerie noises in the darkness round them. It
may have been only a trick of the wind in the cracks and gullies of the rocky
wall, but the sounds were those of shrill cries, and wild howls of laughter.
Stones began to fall from the mountain-side, whistling over their heads, or
crashing on the path beside them. Every now and again they heard a dull
rumble, as a great boulder rolled down from hidden heights above.
 `We cannot go further tonight,' said Boromir. `Let those call it the wind
who will; there are fell voices on the air; and these stones are aimed at us.'
 `I do call it the wind,' said Aragorn. `But that does not make what you
say untrue. There are many evil and unfriendly things in the world that have
little love for those that go on two legs, and yet are not in league with
Sauron, but have purposes of their own. Some have been in this world longer
than he.'
 'Caradhras was called the Cruel, and had an ill name, said Gimli, `long
years ago, when rumour of Sauron had not been heard in these lands.'
 `It matters little who is the enemy, if we cannot beat off his attack;
said Gandalf.
 'But what can we do?' cried Pippin miserably. He was leaning on Merry and
Frodo, and he was shivering.
 `Either stop where we are, or go back,' said Gandalf. 'It is no good
going on. Only a little higher, if I remember rightly, this path leaves the
cliff and runs into a wide shallow trough at the bottom of a long hard slope.
We should have no shelter there from snow, or stones – or anything else.'
 `And it is no good going back while the storm holds,' said Aragorn. `We
have passed no place on the way up that offered more shelter than this cliffwall we are under now.'
 `Shelter!' muttered Sam. `If this is shelter, then one wall and no roof
make a house.'
 The Company now gathered together as close to the cliff as they could. It
faced southwards, and near the bottom it leaned out a little, so that they
hoped it would give them some protection from the northerly wind and from the
falling stones. But eddying blasts swirled round them from every side, and the
snow flowed down in ever denser clouds.
 They huddled together with their backs to the wall. Bill the pony stood
patiently but dejectedly in front of the hobbits, and screened them a little;
but before long the drifting snow was above his hocks, and it went on
mounting. If they had had no larger companions the hobbits would soon have
been entirely buried.
 A great sleepiness came over Frodo; he felt himself sinking fast into a
warm and hazy dream. He thought a fire was heating his toes, and out of the
shadows on the other side of the hearth he heard Bilbo's voice speaking_. I
don't think much of your diary_, he said. _Snowstorms on January the twelfth:
there was no need to come back to report that!_
 _But I wanted rest and sleep, Bilbo_, Frodo answered with an effort, when
he felt himself shaken, and he came back painfully to wakefulness. Boromir had
lifted him off the ground out of a nest of snow.
 `This will be the death of the halflings, Gandalf,' said Boromir. `It is
useless to sit here until the snow goes over our heads. We must do something
to save ourselves.'
 `Give them this,' said Gandalf, searching in his pack and drawing out a
leathern flask. `Just a mouthful each – for all of us. It is very precious. It
is _miruvor_, the cordial of Imladris. Elrond gave it to me at our parting.
Pass it round!'
 As soon as Frodo had swallowed a little of the warm and fragrant liquor
he felt a new strength of heart, and the heavy drowsiness left his limbs. The
others also revived and found fresh hope and vigour. But the snow did not
relent. It whirled about them thicker than ever, and the wind blew louder.
 'What do you say to fire?' asked Boromir suddenly. 'The choice seems near
now between fire and death, Gandalf. Doubtless we shall be hidden from all
unfriendly eyes when the snow has covered us, but that will not help us.'
 'You may make a fire, if you can,' answered Gandalf. 'If there are any
watchers that can endure this storm, then they can see us, fire or no.' But
though they had brought wood and kindlings by the advice of Boromir, it passed
the skill of Elf or even Dwarf to strike a flame that would hold amid the
swirling wind or catch in the wet fuel. At last reluctantly Gandalf himself
took a hand. Picking up a faggot he held it aloft for a moment, and then with
a word of command_, naur an edraith ammen!_ he thrust the end of his staff
into the midst of it. At once a great spout of green and blue flame sprang
out, and the wood flared and sputtered.
 `If there are any to see, then I at least am revealed to them,' he said.
'I have written _Gandalf is here_ in signs that all can read from Rivendell to
the mouths of Anduin.'
 But the Company cared no longer for watchers or unfriendly eyes. Their
hearts were rejoiced to see the light of the fire. The wood burned merrily;
and though all round it the snow hissed, and pools of slush crept under their
feet, they warmed their hands gladly at the blaze. There they stood, stooping
in a circle round the little dancing and blowing flames. A red light was on
their tired and anxious faces; behind them the night was like a black wall.
 But the wood was burning fast, and the snow still fell.
 The fire burned low. and the last faggot was thrown on.
 The night is getting old,' said Aragorn. "The dawn is not far off.'
 `If any dawn can pierce these clouds,' said Gimli.
 Boromir stepped out of the circle and stared up into the blackness. 'The
snow is growing less,' he said, `and the wind is quieter.'
 Frodo gazed wearily at the flakes still falling out of the dark to be
revealed white for a moment in the light of the dying fire; but for a long
time he could see no sign of their slackening. Then suddenly, as sleep was
beginning to creep over him again, he was aware that the wind had indeed
fallen, and the flakes were becoming larger and fewer. Very slowly a dim light
began to grow. At last the snow stopped altogether.
 As the light grew stronger it showed a silent shrouded world. Below their
refuge were white humps and domes and shapeless deeps beneath which the path
that they had trodden was altogether lost; but the heights above were hidden
in great clouds still heavy with the threat of snow.
 Gimli looked up and shook his head. `Caradhras has not forgiven us.' he
said. `He has more snow yet to fling at us, if we go on. The sooner we go back
and down the better.'
 To this all agreed, but their retreat was now difficult. It might well
prove impossible. Only a few paces from the ashes of their fire the snow lay
many feet deep, higher than the heads of the hobbits; in places it had been
scooped and piled by the wind into great drifts against the cliff.
 `If Gandalf would go before us with a bright flame, he might melt a path
for you,' said Legolas. The storm had troubled him little, and he alone of the
Company remained still light of heart.
 `If Elves could fly over mountains, they might fetch the Sun to save
us,' answered Gandalf. `But I must have something to work on. I cannot burn
snow.'
 `Well,' said Boromir, `when heads are at a loss bodies must serve, as we
say in my country. The strongest of us must seek a way. See! Though all is now
snow-clad, our path, as we came up, turned about that shoulder of rock down
yonder. It was there that the snow first began to burden us. If we could reach
that point, maybe it would prove easier beyond. It is no more than a furlong
off, I guess.'
 `Then let us force a path thither, you and I!' said Aragorn.
 Aragorn was the tallest of the Company, but Boromir, little less in
height, was broader and heavier in build. He led the way, and Aragorn followed
him. Slowly they moved off, and were soon toiling heavily. In places the snow
was breast-high, and often Boromir seemed to bc swimming or burrowing with his
great arms rather than walking.
 Legolas watched them for a while with a smile upon his lips, and then he
turned to the others. `The strongest must seek a way, say you? But I say: let
a ploughman plough, but choose an otter for swimming, and for running light
over grass and leaf or over snow-an Elf.'
 With that he sprang forth nimbly, and then Frodo noticed as if for the
first time, though he had long known it, that the Elf had no boots, but wore
only light shoes, as he always did, and his feet made little imprint in the
snow.
 'Farewell!' he said to Gandalf. `I go to find the Sun!' Then swift as a
runner over firm sand he shot away, and quickly overtaking the toiling men,
with a wave of his hand he passed them, and sped into the distance, and
vanished round the rocky turn.
 The others waited huddled together, watching until Boromir and Aragorn
dwindled into black specks in the whiteness. At length they too passed from
sight. The time dragged on. The clouds lowered, and now a few flakes of snow
came curling down again.
 An hour, maybe, went by, though it seemed far longer, and then at last
they saw Legolas coming back. At the same time Boromir and Aragorn reappeared
round the bend far behind him and came labouring up the slope.
 `Well,' cried Legolas as he ran up, `I have not brought the Sun. She is
walking in the blue fields of the South, and a little wreath of snow on this
Redhorn hillock troubles her not at all. But I have brought back a gleam of
good hope for those who are doomed to go on feet. There is the greatest winddrift of all just beyond the
turn, and there our Strong Men were almost
buried. They despaired, until I returned and told them that the drift was
little wider than a wall. And on the other side the snow suddenly grows less,
while further down it is no more than a white coverlet to cool a hobbit's
toes.'
 `Ah, it is as I said,' growled Gimli. 'It was no ordinary storm. It is
the ill will of Caradhras. He does not love Elves and Dwarves, and that drift
was laid to cut off our escape.'
 'But happily your Caradhras has forgotten that you have Men with you,'
said Boromir, who came up at that moment. `And doughty Men too, if I may say
it; though lesser men with spades might have served you better. Still, we have
thrust a lane through the drift; and for that all here may be grateful who
cannot run as light as Elves.'
 `But how are we to get down there, even if you have cut through the
drift?' said Pippin, voicing the thought of all the hobbits.
 'Have hope!' said Boromir. 'I am weary, but I still have some strength
left, and Aragorn too. We will bear the little folk. The others no doubt will
make shift to tread the path behind us. Come, Master Peregrin! I will begin
with you.'
 He lifted up the hobbit. 'Cling to my back! I shall need my arms' he said
and strode forward. Aragorn with Merry came behind. Pippin marvelled at his
strength, seeing the passage that he had already forced with no other tool
than his great limbs. Even now, burdened as he was, he was widening the track
for those who followed, thrusting the snow aside as he went.
 They came at length to the great drift. It was flung across the mountainpath like a sheer and sudden
wall, and its crest, sharp as if shaped with
knives, reared up more than twice the height of Boromir; but through the
middle a passage had been beaten, rising and falling like a bridge. On the far
side Merry and Pippin were set down, and there they waited with Legolas for
the rest of the Company to arrive.
 After a while Boromir returned carrying Sam. Behind in the narrow but now
well-trodden track came Gandalf, leading Bill with Gimli perched among the
baggage. Last came Aragorn carrying Frodo. They passed through the lane; but
hardly had Frodo touched the ground when with a deep rumble there rolled down
a fall of stones and slithering snow. The spray of it half blinded the Company
as they crouched against the cliff, and when the air cleared again they saw
that the path was blocked behind them.
 `Enough, enough!' cried Gimli. 'We are departing as quickly as we may!'
And indeed with that last stroke the malice of the mountain seemed to be
expended, as if Caradhras was satisfied that the invaders had been beaten off
and would not dare to return. The threat of snow lifted; the clouds began to
break and the light grew broader.
 As Legolas had reported, they found that the snow became steadily more
shallow as they went down, so that even the hobbits could trudge along. Soon
they all stood once more on the flat shelf at the head of the steep slope
where they had felt the first flakes of snow the night before.
 The morning was now far advanced. From the high place they looked back
westwards over the lower lands. Far away in the tumble of country that lay at
the foot of the mountain was the dell from which they had started to climb the
pass.
 Frodo's legs ached. He was chilled to the bone and hungry; and his head
was dizzy as he thought of the long and painful march downhill. Black specks
swam before his eyes. He rubbed them, but the black specks remained. In the
distance below him, but still high above the lower foothills, dark dots were
circling in the air.
 `The birds again!' said Aragorn, pointing down.
 'That cannot be helped now,' said Gandalf. `Whether they are good or
evil, or have nothing to do with us at all, we must go down at once. Not even
on the knees of Caradhras will we wait for another night-fall!'
 A cold wind flowed down behind them, as they turned their backs on the
Redhorn Gate, and stumbled wearily down the slope. Caradhras had defeated
them.
 _Chapter 4_
 A Journey in the Dark
 It was evening, and the grey light was again waning fast, when they
halted for the night. They were very weary. The mountains were veiled in
deepening dusk, and the wind was cold. Gandalf spared them one more mouthful
each of the miruvor of Rivendell. When they had eaten some food he called a
council.
 'We cannot, of course, go on again tonight,' he said. `The attack on the
Redhorn Gate has tired us out, and we must rest here for a while.'
 `And then where are we to go? ' asked Frodo.
 'We still have our journey and our errand before us,' answered Gandalf.
`We have no choice but to go on, or to return to Rivendell.'
 Pippin's face brightened visibly at the mere mention of return to
Rivendell; Merry and Sam looked up hopefully. But Aragorn and Boromir made no
sign. Frodo looked troubled.
 `I wish I was back there,' he said. `But how can I return without shame –
unless there is indeed no other way, and we are already defeated? '
 `You are right, Frodo,' said Gandalf: `to go back is to admit defeat and
face worse defeat to come. If we go back now, then the Ring must remain there:
we shall not be able to set out again. Then sooner or later Rivendell will be
besieged, and after a brief and bitter time it will be destroyed. The
Ringwraiths are deadly enemies, but they are only shadows yet of the power and
terror they would possess if the Ruling Ring was on their master's hand
again.'
 'Then we must go on, if there is a way,' said Frodo with a sigh. Sam sank
back into gloom.
 `There is a way that we may attempt,' said Gandalf. `I thought from the
beginning, when first I considered this journey, that we should try it. But it
is not a pleasant way, and I have not spoken of it to the Company before.
Aragorn was against it, until the pass over the mountains had at least been
tried.'
 `If it is a worse road than the Redhorn Gate, then it must be evil
indeed,' said Merry. `But you had better tell us about it, and let us know the
worst at once.'
 'The road that I speak of leads to the Mines of Moria,' said Gandalf.
Only Gimli lifted up his head; a smouldering fire was in his eyes. On all the
others a dread fell at the mention of that name. Even to the hobbits it was a
legend of vague fear:
 `The road may lead to Moria, but how can we hope that it will lead
through Moria? ' said Aragorn darkly.
 `It is a name of ill omen,' said Boromir. `Nor do I see the need to go
there. If we cannot cross the mountains, let us journey southwards, until we
come to the Gap of Rohan, where men are friendly to my people, taking the road
that I followed on my way hither. Or we might pass by and cross the Isen into
Langstrand and Lebennin, and so come to Gondor from the regions nigh to the
sea.'
 'Things have changed since you came north, Boromir,' answered Gandalf.
'Did you not hear what I told you of Saruman? With him I may have business of
my own ere all is over. But the Ring must not come near Isengard, if that can
by any means be prevented. The Gap of Rohan is closed to us while we go with
the Bearer.
 'As for the longer road: we cannot afford the time. We might spend a year
in such a journey, and we should pass through many lands that are empty and
harbourless. Yet they would not be safe. The watchful eyes both of Saruman and
of the Enemy are on them. When you came north, Boromir, you were in the
Enemy's eyes only one stray wanderer from the South and a matter of small
concern to him: his mind was busy with the pursuit of the Ring. But you return
now as a member of the Ring's Company, and you are in peril as long as you
remain with us. The danger will increase with every league that we go south
under the naked sky.
 `Since our open attempt on the mountain-pass our plight has become more
desperate, I fear. I see now little hope, if we do not soon vanish from sight
for a while, and cover our trail. Therefore I advise that we should go neither
over the mountains, nor round them, but under them. That is a road at any rate
that the Enemy will least expect us to take.'
 `We do not know what he expects,' said Boromir. `He may watch all roads,
likely and unlikely. In that case to enter Moria would be to walk into a trap,
hardly better than knocking at the gates of the Dark Tower itself. The name of
Moria is black.'
 `You speak of what you do not know, when you liken Moria to the
stronghold of Sauron,' answered Gandalf. `I alone of you have ever been in the
dungeons of the Dark Lord, and only in his older and lesser dwelling in Dol
Guldur. Those who pass the gates of Barad-dûr do not return. But I would not
lead you into Moria if there were no hope of coming out again. If there are
Orcs there, it may prove ill for us, that is true. But most of the Orcs of the
Misty Mountains were scattered or destroyed in the Battle of Five Armies. The
Eagles report that Orcs are gathering again from afar; but there is a hope
that Moria is still free.
 `There is even a chance that Dwarves are there, and that in some deep
hall of his fathers, Balin son of Fundin may be found. However it may prove,
one must tread the path that need chooses!'
 'I will tread the path with you, Gandalf! ' said Gimli. 'I will go and
look on the halls of Durin, whatever may wait there-if you can find the doors
that are shut.'
 'Good, Gimli! ' said Gandalf. `You encourage me. We will seek the hidden
doors together. And we will come through. In the ruins of the Dwarves, a
dwarf's head will be less easy to bewilder than Elves or Men or Hobbits. Yet
it will not be the first time that I have been to Moria. I sought there long
for Thráin son of Thrór after he was lost. I passed through, and I came out
again alive! '
 `I too once passed the Dimrill Gate,' said Aragorn quietly; 'but though I
also came out again, the memory is very evil. I do not wish to enter Moria a
second time.'
 'And I don't wish to enter it even once,' said Pippin.
 'Nor me,' muttered Sam.
 `Of course not! ' said Gandalf. 'Who would? But the question is: who will
follow me, if I lead you there? '
 'I will,' said Gimli eagerly.
 'I will,' said Aragorn heavily. `You followed my lead almost to disaster
in the snow, and have said no word of blame. I will follow your lead now – if
this last warning does not move you. It is not of the Ring, nor of us others
that I am thinking now, but of you, Gandalf. And I say to you: if you pass the
doors of Moria, beware! '
 `I will _not_ go,' said Boromir; 'not unless the vote of the whole
company is against me. What do Legolas and the little folk say? The Ringbearer's voice surely should be
heard? '
 'I do not wish to go to Moria,' said Legolas.
 The hobbits said nothing. Sam looked at Frodo. At last Frodo spoke. `I do
not wish to go,' he said; `but neither do I wish to refuse the advice of
Gandalf. I beg that there should be no vote, until we have slept on it.
Gandalf will get votes easier in the light of the morning than in this cold
gloom. How the wind howls! '
 At these words all fell into silent thought. They heard the wind hissing
among the rocks and trees, and there was a howling and wailing round them in
the empty spaces of the night.
 Suddenly Aragorn leapt to his feet. 'How the wind howls! ' he cried. 'It
is howling with wolf-voices. The Wargs have come west of the Mountains! '
 'Need we wait until morning then? ' said Gandalf. `It is as I said. The
hunt is up! Even if we live to see the dawn, who now will wish to journey
south by night with the wild wolves on his trail? '
 'How far is Moria? ' asked Boromir.
 `There was a door south-west of Caradhras, some fifteen miles as the crow
flies, and maybe twenty as the wolf runs,' answered Gandalf grimly.
 'Then let us start as soon as it is light tomorrow, if we can,' said
Boromir. 'The wolf that one hears is worse than the orc that one fears.'
 `True!' said Aragorn, loosening his sword in its sheath. `But where the
warg howls, there also the orc prowls.'
 `I wish I had taken Elrond's advice,' muttered Pippin to Sam. `I am no
good after all. There is not enough of the breed of Bandobras the Bullroarer
in me: these howls freeze my blood. I don't ever remember feeling so
wretched.'
 'My heart's right down in my toes, Mr. Pippin,' said Sam. 'But we aren't
etten yet, and there are some stout folk here with us. Whatever may be in
store for old Gandalf, I'll wager it isn't a wolf's belly.'
 For their defence in the night the Company climbed to the top of the
small hill under which they had been sheltering. it was crowned with a knot of
old and twisted trees, about which lay a broken circle of boulder stones. In
the midst of this they lit a fire, for there was no hope that darkness and
silence would keep their trail from discovery by the hunting packs.
 Round the fire they sat, and those that were not on guard dozed uneasily.
Poor Bill the pony trembled and sweated where he stood. The howling of the
wolves was now all round them, sometimes nearer and sometimes further off. In
the dead of the night many shining eyes were seen peering over the brow of the
hill. Some advanced almost to the ring of stones. At a gap in the circle a
great dark wolf-shape could be seen halted, gazing at them. A shuddering howl
broke from him, as if he were a captain summoning his pack to the assault.
 Gandalf stood up and strode forward, holding his staff aloft. 'Listen,
Hound of Sauron! ' he cried. `Gandalf is here. Fly, if you value your foul
skin! I will shrivel you from tail to snout, if you come within this ring.'
 The wolf snarled and sprang towards them with a great leap. At that
moment there was a sharp twang. Legolas had loosed his bow. There was a
hideous yell, and the leaping shape thudded to the ground; the elvish arrow
had pierced its throat. The watching eyes were suddenly extinguished. Gandalf
and Aragorn strode forward, but the hill was deserted; the hunting packs had
fled. All about them the darkness grew silent, and no cry came on the sighing
wind.
 The night was old, and westward the waning moon was setting. gleaming
fitfully through the breaking clouds. Suddenly Frodo started from sleep.
Without warning a storm of howls broke out fierce and wild all about the camp.
A great host of Wargs had gathered silently and was now attacking them from
every side at once.
 `Fling fuel on the fire!' cried Gandalf to the hobbits. `Draw your
blades, and stand back to back!'
 In the leaping light, as the fresh wood blazed up, Frodo saw many grey
shapes spring over the ring of stones. More and more followed. Through the
throat of one huge leader Aragorn passed his sword with a thrust; with a great
sweep Boromir hewed the head off another. Beside them Gimli stood with his
stout legs apart, wielding his dwarf-axe. The bow of Legolas was singing.
 In the wavering firelight Gandalf seemed suddenly to grow: he rose up, a
great menacing shape like the monument of some ancient king of stone set upon
a hill. Stooping like a cloud, he lifted a burning branch and strode to meet
the wolves. They gave back before him. High in the air he tossed the blazing
brand. It flared with a sudden white radiance like lightning; and his voice
rolled like thunder.
 `_Naur an edraith ammen! Naur dan i ngaurhoth!_' he cried.
 There was a roar and a crackle, and the tree above him burst into a leaf
and bloom of blinding flame. The fire leapt from tree-top to tree-top. The
whole hill was crowned with dazzling light. The swords and knives of the
defenders shone and flickered. The last arrow of Legolas kindled in the air as
it flew, and plunged burning into the heart of a great wolf-chieftain. All the
others fled.
 Slowly the fire died till nothing was left but falling ash and sparks; a
bitter smoke curled above the burned tree-stumps, and blew darkly from the
hill, as the first light of dawn came dimly in the sky. Their enemies were
routed and did not return.
 `What did I tell you, Mr. Pippin? ' said Sam, she/thing his sword.
`Wolves won't get him. That was an eye-opener, and no mistake! Nearly singed
the hair off my head!'
 When the full light of the morning came no signs of the wolves were to be
found, and they looked in vain for the bodies of the dead. No trace of the
fight remained but the charred trees and the arrows of Legolas lying on the
hill-top. All were undamaged save one of which only the point was left.
 `It is as I feared,' said Gandalf. `These were no ordinary wolves hunting
for food in the wilderness. Let us eat quickly and go!'
 That day the weather changed again, almost as if it was at the command of
some power that had no longer any use for snow, since they had retreated from
the pass, a power that wished now to have a clear light in which things that
moved in the wild could be seen from far away. The wind had been turning
through north to north-west during the night, and now it failed. The clouds
vanished southwards and the sky was opened, high and blue. As they stood upon
the hill-side, ready to depart, a pale sunlight gleamed over the mountaintops.
 `We must reach the doors before sunset,' said Gandalf, 'or I fear we
shall not reach them at all. It is not far, but our path may be winding, for
here Aragorn cannot guide us; he has seldom walked in this country, and only
once have I been under the west wall of Moria, and that was long ago.
 `There it lies,' he said, pointing away south-eastwards to where the
mountains' sides fell sheer into the shadows at their feet. In the distance
could be dimly seen a line of bare cliffs, and in their midst, taller than the
rest, one great grey wall. `When we left the pass I led you southwards, and
not back to our starting point, as some of you may have noticed. It is well
that I did so, for now we have several miles less to cross, and haste is
needed. Let us go! '
 `I do not know which to hope,' said Boromir grimly: `that Gandalf will
find what he seeks, or that coming to the cliff we shall find the gates lost
for ever. All choices seem ill, and to be caught between wolves and the wall
the likeliest chance. Lead on!'
 Gimli now walked ahead by the wizard's side, so eager was he to come to
Moria. Together they led the Company back towards the mountains. The only road
of old to Moria from the west had lain along the course of a stream, the
Sirannon, that ran out from the feet of the cliffs near where the doors had
stood. But either Gandalf was astray, or else the land had changed in recent
years; for he did not strike the stream where he looked to find it, only a few
miles southwards from their start.
 The morning was passing towards noon, and still the Company wandered and
scrambled in a barren country of red stones. Nowhere could they see any gleam
of water or hear any sound of it. All was bleak and dry. Their hearts sank.
They saw no living thing, and not a bird was in the sky; but what the night
would bring, if it caught them in that lost land, none of them cared to think.
 Suddenly Gimli, who had pressed on ahead, called back to them. He was
standing on a knoll and pointing to the right. Hurrying up they saw below them
a deep and narrow channel. It was empty and silent, and hardly a trickle of
water flowed among the brown and red-stained stones of its bed; but on the
near side there was a path, much broken and decayed, that wound its way among
the ruined walls and paving-stones of an ancient highroad.
 'Ah! Here it is at last! ' said Gandalf. `This is where the stream ran:
Sirannon, the Gate-stream, they used to call it. But what has happened to the
water, I cannot guess; it used to be swift and noisy. Come! We must hurry on.
We are late.'
 The Company were footsore and tired; but they trudged doggedly along the
rough and winding track for many miles. The sun turned from the noon and began
to go west. After a brief halt and a hasty meal they went on again. Before
them the mountains frowned, but their path lay in a deep trough of land and
they could see only the higher shoulders and the far eastward peaks.
 At length they came to a sharp bend. There the road, which had been
veering southwards between the brink of the channel and a steep fall of the
land to the left, turned and went due east again. Rounding the corner they saw
before them a low cliff, some five fathoms high, with a broken and jagged top.
Over it a trickling water dripped, through a wide cleft that seemed to have
been carved out by a fall that had once been strong and full.
 `Indeed things have changed! ' said Gandalf. `But there is no mistaking
the place. There is all that remains of the Stair Falls. If I remember right,
there was a flight of steps cut in the rock at their side, but the main road
wound away left and climbed with several loops up to the level ground at the
top. There used to be a shallow valley beyond the falls right up to the Walls
of Moria, and the Sirannon flowed through it with the road beside it. Let us
go and see what things are like now! '
 They found the stone steps without difficulty, and Gimli sprang swiftly
up them, followed by Gandalf and Frodo. When they reached the top they saw
that they could go no further that way, and the reason for the drying up of
the Gate-stream was revealed. Behind them the sinking Sun filled the cool
western sky with glimmering gold. Before them stretched a dark still lake.
Neither sky nor sunset was reflected on its sullen surface. The Sirannon had
been dammed and had filled all the valley. Beyond the ominous water were
reared vast cliffs, their stern faces pallid in the fading light: final and
impassable. No sign of gate or entrance, not a fissure or crack could Frodo
see in the frowning stone.
 `There are the Walls of Moria,' said Gandalf, pointing across the water.
`And there the Gate stood once upon a time, the Elven Door at the end of the
road from Hollin by which we have come. But this way is blocked. None of the
Company, I guess, will wish to swim this gloomy water at the end of the day.
It has an unwholesome look.'
 `We must find a way round the northern edge,' said Gimli. `The first
thing for the Company to do is to climb up by the main path and see where that
will lead us. Even if there were no lake, we could not get our baggage-pony up
this stair.'
 `But in any case we cannot take the poor beast into the Mines,' said
Gandalf. `The road under the mountains is a dark road, and there are places
narrow and steep which he cannot tread, even if we can.'
 `Poor old Bill! ' said Frodo. `I had not thought of that. And poor Sam! I
wonder what he will say? '
 `I am sorry,' said Gandalf. `Poor Bill has been a useful companion and it
goes to my heart to turn him adrift now. I would have travelled lighter and
brought no animal, least of all this one that Sam is fond of, if I had had my
way. I feared all along that we should be obliged to take this road.'
 The day was drawing to its end, and cold stars were glinting in the sky
high above the sunset, when the Company, with all the speed they could,
climbed up the slopes and reached the side of the lake. In breadth it looked
to be no more than two or three furlongs at the widest point. How far it
stretched away southward they could not see in the failing light; but its
northern end was no more than half a mile from where they stood, and between
the stony ridges that enclosed the valley and the water's edge there was a rim
of open ground. They hurried forward, for they had still a mile or two to go
before they could reach the point on the far shore that Gandalf was making
for; and then he had still to find the doors.
 When they came to the northernmost corner of the lake they found a narrow
creek that barred their way. It was green and stagnant, thrust out like a
slimy arm towards the enclosing hills. Gimli strode forward undeterred, and
found that the water was shallow, no more than ankle-deep at the edge. Behind
him they walked in file, threading their way with care, for under the weedy
pools were sliding and greasy stones, and footing was treacherous. Frodo
shuddered with disgust at the touch of the dark unclean water on his feet.
 As Sam, the last of the Company, led Bill up on to the dry ground on the
far side, there came a soft sound: a swish, followed by a plop, as if a fish
had disturbed the still surface of the water. Turning quickly they saw
ripples, black-edged with shadow in the waning light: great rings were
widening outwards from a point far out in the lake. There was a bubbling
noise, and then silence. The dusk deepened, and the last gleams of the sunset
were veiled in cloud.
 Gandalf now pressed on at a great pace, and the others followed as
quickly as they could. They reached the strip of dry land between the lake and
the cliffs: it was narrow, often hardly a dozen yards across, and encumbered
with fallen rock and stones; but they found a way, hugging the cliff, and
keeping as far from the dark water as they might. A mile southwards along the
shore they came upon holly trees. Stumps and dead boughs were rotting in the
shallows, the remains it seemed of old thickets, or of a hedge that had once
lined the road across the drowned valley. But close under the cliff there
stood, still strong and living, . two tall trees, larger than any trees of
holly that Frodo had ever seen or imagined. Their great roots spread from the
wall to the water. Under the looming cliffs they had looked like mere bushes,
when seen far off from the top of the Stair; but now they towered overhead,
stiff, dark, and silent, throwing deep night-shadows about their feet,
standing like sentinel pillars at the end of the road.
 `Well, here we are at last! ' said Gandalf. 'Here the Elven-way from
Hollin ended. Holly was the token of the people of that land, and they planted
it here to mark the end of their domain; for the West-door was made chiefly
for their use in their traffic with the Lords of Moria. Those were happier
days, when there was still close friendship at times between folk of different
race, even between Dwarves and Elves.'
 'It was not the fault of the Dwarves that the friendship waned,' said
Gimli.
 'I have not heard that it was the fault of the Elves,' said Legolas.
 'I have heard both,' said Gandalf; 'and I will not give judgement now.
But I beg you two, Legolas and Gimli, at least to be friends, and to help me.
I need you both. The doors are shut and hidden, and the sooner we find them
the better. Night is at hand! '
 Turning to the others he said: 'While I am searching, will you each make
ready to enter the Mines? For here I fear we must say farewell to our good
beast of burden. You must lay aside much of the stuff that we brought against
bitter weather: you will not need it inside, nor, I hope, when we come through
and journey on down into the South. Instead each of us must take a share of
what the pony carried, especially the food and the water-skins.'
 'But you can't leave poor old Bill behind in this forsaken place, Mr.
Gandalf! ' cried Sam, angry and distressed. `I won't have it, and that's flat.
After he has come so far and all! '
 'I am sorry, Sam,' said the wizard. `But when the Door opens I do not
think you will be able to drag your Bill inside, into the long dark of Moria.
You will have to choose between Bill and your master.'
 'He'd follow Mr. Frodo into a dragon's den, if I led him,' protested Sam.
`It'd be nothing short of murder to turn him loose with all these wolves
about.'
 'It will be short of murder, I hope,' said Gandalf. He laid his hand on
the pony's head, and spoke in a low voice. `Go with words of guard and guiding
on you,' he said. `You are a wise beast, and have learned much in Rivendell.
Make your ways to places where you can find grass, and so come in time to
Elrond's house, or wherever you wish to go.
 `There, Sam! He will have quite as much chance of escaping wolves and
getting home as we have.'
 Sam stood sullenly by the pony and returned no answer. Bill, seeming to
understand well what was going on, nuzzled up to him, putting his nose to
Sam's ear. Sam burst into tears, and fumbled with the straps, unlading all the
pony's packs and throwing them on the ground. The others sorted out the goods,
making a pile of all that could be left behind, and dividing up the rest.
 When this was done they turned to watch Gandalf. He appeared to have done
nothing. He was standing between the two trees gazing at the blank wall of the
cliff, as if he would bore a hole into it with his eyes. Gimli was wandering
about, tapping the stone here and there with his axe. Legolas was pressed
against the rock, as if listening.
 'Well, here we are and all ready,' said Merry; `but where are the Doors?
I can't see any sign of them.'
 'Dwarf-doors are not made to be seen when shut,' said Gimli. `They are
invisible, and their own masters cannot find them or open them, if their
secret is forgotten.'
 'But this Door was not made to be a secret known only to Dwarves,' said
Gandalf, coming suddenly to life and turning round. `Unless things are
altogether changed, eyes that know what to look for may discover the signs.'
 He walked forward to the wall. Right between the shadow of the trees
there was a smooth space, and over this he passed his hands to and fro,
muttering words under his breath. Then he stepped back.
 'Look!' he said. `Can you see anything now?'
 The Moon now shone upon the grey face of the rock; but they could see
nothing else for a while. Then slowly on the surface, where the wizard's hands
had passed, faint lines appeared, like slender veins of silver running in the
stone. At first they were no more than pale gossamer-threads, so fine that
they only twinkled fitfully where the Moon caught them, but steadily they grew
broader and clearer, until their design could be guessed.
 At the top, as high as Gandalf could reach, was an arch of interlacing
letters in an Elvish character. Below, though the threads were in places
blurred or broken, the outline could be seen of an anvil and a hammer
surmounted by a crown with seven stars. Beneath these again were two trees,
each bearing crescent moons. More clearly than all else there shone forth in
the middle of the door a single star with many rays.
 `There are the emblems of Durin!' cried Gimli.
 `And there is the Tree of the High Elves!' said Legolas.
 `And the Star of the House of Fëanor,' said Gandalf. `They are wrought of
_ithildin_ that mirrors only starlight and moonlight, and sleeps until it is
touched by one who speaks words now long forgotten in Middle-earth. It is long
since I heard them, and I thought deeply before I could recall them to my
mind.'
 'What does the writing say?' asked Frodo, who was trying to decipher the
inscription on the arch. 'I thought I knew the elf-letters but I cannot read
these.'
 `The words are in the elven-tongue of the West of Middle-earth in the
Elder Days,' answered Gandalf. 'But they do not say anything of importance to
us. They say only: _The Doors of Durin, Lord of Moria. Speak, friend, and
enter_. And underneath small and faint is written: _I, Narvi, made them.
Celebrimbor of Hollin drew these signs._'
 `What does it mean by _speak, friend, and enter_?' asked Merry.
 'That is plain enough,' said Gimli. `If you are a friend, speak the
password, and the doors will open, and you can enter.'
 'Yes,' said Gandalf, 'these doors are probably governed by words. Some
dwarf-gates will open only at special times, or for particular persons; and
some have locks and keys that are still needed when all necessary times and
words are known. These doors have no key. In the days of Durin they were not
secret. They usually stood open and doorwards sat here. But if they were shut,
any who knew the opening word could speak it and pass in. At least so it is
recorded, is it not, Gimli? '
 'It is,' said the dwarf. `But what the word was is not remembered. Narvi
and his craft and all his kindred have vanished from the earth.'
 'But do not _you_ know the word, Gandalf? ' asked Boromir in surprise.
 `No! ' said the wizard.
 The others looked dismayed; only Aragorn, who knew Gandalf well, remained
silent and unmoved.
 'Then what was the use of bringing us to this accursed spot?' cried
Boromir, glancing back with a shudder at the dark water. `You told us that you
had once passed through the Mines. How could that be, if you did not know how
to enter? '
 `The answer to your first question, Boromir,' said the wizard, `is that I
do not know the word-yet. But we shall soon see. And,' he added, with a glint
in his eyes under their bristling brows, 'you may ask what is the use of my
deeds when they are proved useless. As for your other question: do you doubt
my tale? Or have you no wits left? I did not enter this way. I came from the
East.
 `If you wish to know, I will tell you that these doors open outwards.
From the inside you may thrust them open with your hands. From the outside
nothing will move them save the spell of command. They cannot be forced
inwards.'
 `What are you going to do then? ' asked Pippin, undaunted by the wizard's
bristling brows.
 `Knock on the doors with your head, Peregrin Took,' said Gandalf. `But if
that does not shatter them, and I am allowed a little peace from foolish
questions, I will seek for the opening words.
 `I once knew every spell in all the tongues of Elves or Men or Orcs that
was ever used for such a purpose. I can still remember ten score of them
without searching in my mind. But only a few trials, I think, will be needed;
and I shall not have to call on Gimli for words of the secret dwarf-tongue
that they teach to none. The opening words were Elvish, like the writing on
the arch: that seems certain.'
 He stepped up to the rock again, and lightly touched with his staff the
silver star in the middle beneath the sign of the anvil.
 Annon edhellen, edro hi ammen!
 Fennas nogothrim, lasto beth lammen!
 he said in a commanding voice. The silver lines faded, but the blank grey
stone did not stir.
 Many times he repeated these words in different order, or varied them.
Then he tried other spells. one after another, speaking now faster and louder,
now soft and slow. Then he spoke many single words of Elvish speech. Nothing
happened. The cliff towered into the night, the countless stars were kindled,
the wind blew cold, and the doors stood fast.
 Again Gandalf approached the wall, and lifting up his arms he spoke in
tones of command and rising wrath. _Edro, edro!_ he cried, and struck the rock
with his staff. _Open, open!_ he shouted, and followed it with the same
command in every language that had ever been spoken in the West of Middleearth. Then he threw his
staff on the ground, and sat down in silence.
 At that moment from far off the wind bore to their listening ears the
howling of wolves. Bill the pony started in fear, and Sam sprang to his side
and whispered softly to him.
 'Do not let him run away! ' said Boromir. 'It seems that we shall need
him still, if the wolves do not find us. How I hate this foul pool! ' He
stooped and picking up a large stone he cast it far into the dark water.
 The stone vanished with a soft slap; but at the same instant there was a
swish and a bubble. Great rippling rings formed on the surface out beyond
where the stone had fallen, and they moved slowly towards the foot of the
cliff.
 'Why did you do that, Boromir? ' said Frodo. `I hate this place, too, and
I am afraid. I don't know of what: not of wolves, or the dark behind the
doors, but of something else. I am afraid of the pool. Don't disturb it! '
 'l wish we could get away! ' said Merry.
 'Why doesn't Gandalf do something quick? ' said Pippin.
 Gandalf took no notice of them. He sat with his head bowed, either in
despair or in anxious thought. The mournful howling of the wolves was heard
again. The ripples on the water grew and came closer; some were already
lapping on the shore.
 With a suddenness that startled them all the wizard sprang to his feet.
He was laughing! `I have it! ' he cried. 'Of course, of course! Absurdly
simple, like most riddles when you see the answer.'
 Picking up his staff he stood before the rock and said in a clear voice:
_Mellon!_
 The star shone out briefly and faded again. Then silently a great doorway
was outlined, though not a crack or joint had been visible before. Slowly it
divided in the middle and swung outwards inch by inch, until both doors lay
back against the wall. Through the opening a shadowy stair could be seen
climbing steeply up; but beyond the lower steps the darkness was deeper than
the night. The Company stared in wonder.
 `I was wrong after all,' said Gandalf, 'and Gimli too. Merry, of all
people, was on the right track. The opening word was inscribed on the archway
all the time! The translation should have been: _Say "Friend" and enter._ I
had only to speak the Elvish word for _friend_ and the doors opened. Quite
simple. Too simple for a learned lore-master in these suspicious days. Those
were happier times. Now let us go!'
 He strode forward and set his foot on the lowest step. But at that moment
several things happened. Frodo felt something seize him by the ankle, and he
fell with a cry. Bill the pony gave a wild neigh of fear, and turned tail and
dashed away along the lakeside into the darkness. Sam leaped after him, and
then hearing Frodo's cry he ran back again, weeping and cursing. The others
swung round and saw the waters of the lake seething, as if a host of snakes
were swimming up from the southern end.
 Out from the water a long sinuous tentacle had crawled; it was pale-green
and luminous and wet. Its fingered end had hold of Frodo's foot and was
dragging him into the water. Sam on his knees was now slashing at it with a
knife.
 The arm let go of Frodo, and Sam pulled him away, crying out for help.
Twenty others arms came rippling out. The dark water boiled, and there was a
hideous stench.
 `Into the gateway! Up the stairs! Quick! ' shouted Gandalf leaping back.
Rousing them from the horror that seemed to have rooted all but Sam to the
ground where they stood, he drove them forward.
 They were just in time. Sam and Frodo were only a few steps up, and
Gandalf had just begun to climb, when the groping tentacles writhed across the
narrow shore and fingered the cliff-wall and the doors. One came wriggling
over the threshold, glistening in the starlight. Gandalf turned and paused. If
he was considering what word would close the gate again from within, there was
no need. Many coiling arms seized the doors on either side, and with horrible
strength, swung them round. With a shattering echo they slammed, and all light
was lost. A noise of rending and crashing came dully through the ponderous
stone.
 Sam, clinging to Frodo's arm, collapsed on a step in the black darkness.
`Poor old Bill! ' he said in a choking voice. `Poor old Bill! Wolves and
snakes! But the snakes were too much for him. I had to choose, Mr. Frodo. I
had to come with you.'
 They heard Gandalf go back down the steps and thrust his staff against
the doors. There was a quiver in the stone and the stairs trembled, .but the
doors did not open. `Well, well! ' said the wizard. `The passage is blocked
behind us now and there is only one way out–on the other side of the
mountains. I fear from the sounds that boulders have been piled up, and the
trees uprooted and thrown across the gate. I am sorry; for the trees were
beautiful, and had stood so long.'
 `I felt that something horrible was near from the moment that my foot
first touched the water,' said Frodo. 'What was the thing, or were there many
of them? '
 'I do not know,' answered Gandalf, 'but the arms were all guided by one
purpose. Something has crept, or has been driven out of dark waters under the
mountains. There are older and fouler things than Orcs in the deep places of
the world.' He did not speak aloud his thought that whatever it was that dwelt
in the lake, it had seized on Frodo first among all the Company.
 Boromir muttered under his breath, but the echoing stone magnified the
sound to a hoarse whisper that all could hear: `In the deep places of the
world! And thither we are going against my wish. Who will lead us now in this
deadly dark? '
 'I will,' said Gandalf, 'and Gimli shall walk with me. Follow my staff! '
 As the wizard passed on ahead up the great steps, he held his staff
aloft, and from its tip there came a faint radiance. The wide stairway was
sound and undamaged. Two hundred steps they counted, broad and shallow; and at
the top they found an arched passage with a level floor leading on into the
dark.
 `Let us sit and rest and have something to eat, here on the landing,
since we can't find a dining-room! ' said Frodo. He had begun to shake off the
terror of the clutching arm, and suddenly he felt extremely hungry.
 The proposal was welcomed by all; and they sat down on the upper steps,
dim figures in the gloom. After they had eaten, Gandalf gave them each a third
sip of the miruvor of Rivendell.
 `It will not last much longer, I am afraid,' he said; 'but I think we
need it after that horror at the gate. And unless we have great luck, we shall
need all that is left before we see the other side! Go carefully with the
water, too! There are many streams and wells in the Mines, but they should not
be touched. We may not have a chance of filling our skins and bottles till we
come down into Dimrill Dale.'
 'How long is that going to take us? ' asked Frodo.
 'I cannot say,' answered Gandalf. 'It depends on many chances. But going
straight, without mishap or losing our way, we shall take three or four
marches, I expect. It cannot be less than forty miles from West-door to Eastgate in a direct line, and the
road may wind much.'
 After only a brief rest they started on their way again. All were eager
to get the journey over as quickly as possible, and were willing, tired as
they were, to go on marching still for several hours. Gandalf walked in front
as before. In his left hand he held up his glimmering staff, the light of
which just showed the ground before his feet; in his right he held his sword
Glamdring. Behind him came Gimli, his eyes glinting in the dim light as he
turned his head from side to side. Behind the dwarf walked Frodo, and he had
drawn the short sword, Sting. No gleam came from the blades of Sting or of
Glamdring; and that was some comfort, for being the work of Elvish smiths in
the Elder Days these swords shone with a cold light, if any Orcs were near at
hand. Behind Frodo went Sam, and after him Legolas, and the young hobbits, and
Boromir. In the dark at the rear, grim and silent, walked Aragorn.
 The passage twisted round a few turns, and then began to descend. It went
steadily down for a long while before it became level once again. The air grew
hot and stifling, but it was not foul, and at times they felt currents of
cooler air upon their faces, issuing from half-guessed openings in the walls.
There were many of these. In the pale ray of the wizard's staff, Frodo caught
glimpses of stairs and arches and of other passages and tunnels, sloping up,
or running steeply down, or opening blankly dark on either side. It was
bewildering beyond hope of remembering.
 Gimli aided Gandalf very little, except by his stout courage. At least he
was not, as were most of the others, troubled by the mere darkness in itself.
Often the wizard consulted him at points where the choice of way was doubtful;
but it was always Gandalf who had the final word. The Mines of Moria were vast
and intricate beyond the imagination of Gimli, Glóin's son, dwarf of the
mountain-race though he was. To Gandalf the far-off memories of a journey long
before were now of little help, but even in the gloom and despite all windings
of the road he knew whither he wished to go, and he did not falter, as long as
there was a path that led towards his goal.
 `Do not be afraid! ' said Aragorn. There was a pause longer than usual,
and Gandalf and Gimli were whispering together; the others were crowded
behind, waiting anxiously. `Do not be afraid! I have been with him on many a
journey, if never on one so dark; and there are tales of Rivendell of greater
deeds of his than any that I have seen. He will not go astray-if there is any
path to find. He has led us in here against our fears, but he will lead us out
again, at whatever cost to himself. He is surer of finding the way home in a
blind night than the cats of Queen Berúthiel.'
 It was well for the Company that they had such a guide. They had no fuel
nor any means of making torches; in the desperate scramble at the doors many
things had been left behind. But without any light they would soon have come
to grief. There were not only many roads to choose from, there were also in
many places holes and pitfalls, and dark wells beside the path in which their
passing feet echoed. There were fissures and chasms in the walls and floor,
and every now and then a crack would open right before their feet. The widest
was more than seven feet across, and it was long before Pippin could summon
enough courage to leap over the dreadful gap. The noise of churning water came
up from far below, as if some great mill-wheel was turning in the depths.
 `Rope! ' muttered Sam. `I knew I'd want it, if I hadn't got it! '
 As these dangers became more frequent their march became slower. Already
they seemed to have been tramping on, on, endlessly to the mountains' roots.
They were more than weary, and yet there seemed no comfort in the thought of
halting anywhere. Frodo's spirits had risen for a while after his escape, and
after food and a draught of the cordial; but now a deep uneasiness, growing to
dread, crept over him again. Though he had been healed in Rivendell of the
knife-stroke, that grim wound had not been without effect. His senses were
sharper and more aware of things that could not be seen. One sign of change
that he soon had noticed was that he could see more in the dark than any of
his companions, save perhaps Gandalf. And he was in any case the bearer of the
Ring: it hung upon its chain against his breast, and at whiles it seemed a
heavy weight. He felt the certainty of evil ahead and of evil following; but
he said nothing. He gripped tighter on the hilt of his sword and went on
doggedly.
 The Company behind him spoke seldom, and then only in hurried whispers.
There was no sound but the sound of their own feet; the dull stump of Gimli's
dwarf-boots; the heavy tread of Boromir; the light step of Legolas; the soft,
scarce-heard patter of hobbit-feet; and in the rear the slow firm footfalls of
Aragorn with his long stride. When they halted for a moment they heard nothing
at all, unless it were occasionally a faint trickle and drip of unseen water.
Yet Frodo began to hear, or to imagine that he heard, something else: like the
faint fall of soft bare feet. It was never loud enough, or near enough, for
him to feel certain that he heard it; but once it had started it never
stopped, while the Company was moving. But it was not an echo, for when they
halted it pattered on for a little all by itself, and then grew still.
 It was after nightfall when they had entered the Mines. They had been
going for several hours with only brief halts, when Gandalf came to his first
serious check. Before him stood a wide dark arch opening into three passages:
all led in the same general direction, eastwards; but the left-hand passage
plunged down, while the right-hand climbed up, and the middle way seemed to
run on, smooth and level but very narrow.
 'I have no memory of this place at all! ' said Gandalf, standing
uncertainly under the arch. He held up his staff in the hope of finding some
marks or inscription that might help his choice; but nothing of the kind was
to be seen. `I am too weary to decide,' he said, shaking his head. `And I
expect that you are all as weary as I am, or wearier. We had better halt here
for what is left of the night. You know what I mean! In here it is ever dark;
but outside the late Moon is riding westward and the middle-night has passed.'
 `Poor old Bill! ' said Sam. 'I wonder where he is. I hope those wolves
haven't got him yet.'
 To the left of the great arch they found a stone door: it was half
closed, but swung back easily to a gentle thrust. Beyond there seemed to lie a
wide chamber cut in the rock.
 `Steady! Steady! ' cried Gandalf as Merry and Pippin pushed forward, glad
to find a place where they could rest with at least more feeling of shelter
than in the open passage. `Steady! You do not know what is inside yet. I will
go first.'
 He went in cautiously, and the others filed behind. `There! ' he said,
pointing with his staff to the middle of the floor. Before his feet they saw a
large round hole like the mouth of a well. Broken and rusty chains lay at the
edge and trailed down into the black pit. Fragments of stone lay near.
 'One of you might have fallen in and still be wondering when you were
going to strike the bottom,' said Aragorn to Merry. 'Let the guide go first
while you have one.'
 'This seems to have been a guardroom, made for the watching of the three
passages,' said Gimli. `That hole was plainly a well for the guards' use,
covered with a stone lid. But the lid is broken, and we must all take care in
the dark.'
 Pippin felt curiously attracted by the well. While the others were
unrolling blankets and making beds against the walls of the chamber, as far as
possible from the hole in the floor, he crept to the edge and peered over. A
chill air seemed to strike his face, rising from invisible depths. Moved by a
sudden impulse he groped for a loose stone, and let it drop. He felt his heart
beat many times before there was any sound. Then far below, as if the stone
had fallen into deep water in some cavernous place, there came a _plunk_, very
distant, but magnified and repeated in the hollow shaft.
 `What's that? ' cried Gandalf. He was relieved when Pippin confessed what
he had done; but he was angry, and Pippin could see his eye glinting. 'Fool of
a Took! ' he growled. 'This is a serious journey, not a hobbit walking-party.
Throw yourself in next time, and then you will be no further nuisance. Now be
quiet! '
 Nothing more was heard for several minutes; but then there came out of
the depths faint knocks: _tom-tap, tap-tom_. They stopped, and when the echoes
had died away, they were repeated: _tap-tom, tom-tap, tap-tap, tom_. They
sounded disquietingly like signals of some sort; but after a while the
knocking died away and was not heard again.
 'That was the sound of a hammer, or I have never heard one,' said Gimli.
 `Yes,' said Gandalf, 'and I do not like it. It may have nothing to do
with Peregrin's foolish stone; but probably something has been disturbed that
would have been better left quiet. Pray, do nothing of the kind again! Let us
hope we shall get some rest without further trouble. You, Pippin, can go on
the first watch, as a reward,' he growled, as he rolled himself in a blanket.
 Pippin sat miserably by the door in the pitch dark; but he kept on
turning round, fearing that some unknown thing would crawl up out of the well.
He wished he could cover the hole, if only with a blanket, but he dared not
move or go near it, even though Gandalf seemed to be asleep.
 Actually Gandalf was awake, though lying still and silent. He was deep in
thought, trying to recall every memory of his former journey in the Mines, and
considering anxiously the next course that he should take; a false turn now
might be disastrous. After an hour he rose up and came over to Pippin.
 `Get into a corner and have a sleep, my lad,' he said in a kindly tone.
'You want to sleep, I expect. I cannot get a wink, so I may as well do the
watching.'
 'I know what is the matter with me,' he muttered, as he sat down by the
door. 'I need smoke! I have not tasted it since the morning before the
snowstorm.'
 The last thing that Pippin saw, as sleep took him, was a dark glimpse of
the old wizard huddled on the floor, shielding a glowing chip in his gnarled
hands between his knees. The flicker for a moment showed his sharp nose. and
the puff of smoke.
 It was Gandalf who roused them all from sleep. He had sat and watched all
alone for about six hours, and had let the others rest. `And in the watches I
have made up my mind,' he said. `I do not like the feel of the middle way; and
I do not like the smell of the left-hand way: there is foul air down there, or
I am no guide. I shall take the right-hand passage. It is time we began to
climb up again.'
 For eight dark hours, not counting two brief halts, they marched on; and
they met no danger, and heard nothing, and saw nothing but the faint gleam of
the wizard's light, bobbing like a will-o'-the-wisp in front of them. The
passage they had chosen wound steadily upwards. As far as they could judge it
went in great mounting curves, and as it rose it grew loftier and wider. There
were now no openings to other galleries or tunnels on either side, and the
floor was level and sound, without pits or cracks. Evidently they had struck
what once had been an important road; and they went forward quicker than they
had done on their first march.
 In this way they advanced some fifteen miles, measured in a direct line
east, though they must have actually walked twenty miles or more. As the road
climbed upwards` Frodo's spirits rose a little; but he still felt oppressed,
and still at times he heard, or thought he heard, away behind the Company and
beyond the fall and patter of their feet, a following footstep that was not an
echo.
 They had marched as far as the hobbits could endure without a rest, and
all were thinking of a place where they could sleep, when suddenly the walls
to right and left vanished. They seemed to have passed through some arched
doorway into a black and empty space. There was a great draught of warmer air
behind them, and before them the darkness was cold on their faces. They halted
and crowded anxiously together.
 Gandalf seemed pleased. `I chose the right way,' he said. `At last we are
coming to the habitable parts, and I guess that we are not far now from the
eastern side. But we are high up, a good deal higher than the Dimrill Gate,
unless I am mistaken. From the feeling of the air we must be in a wide hall. I
will now risk a little real light.'
 He raised his staff, and for a brief instant there was blaze like a flash
of lightning. Great shadows sprang up and fled, and for a second they saw a
vast roof far above their heads upheld by many mighty pillars hewn of stone.
Before them and on either side stretched a huge empty hall; its black walls,
polished and smooth as glass, flashed and glittered. Three other entrances
they saw, dark black arches: one straight before them eastwards, and one on
either side. Then the light went out.
 `That is all that I shall venture on for the present,' said Gandalf.
'There used to be great windows on the mountain-side, and shafts leading out
to the light in the upper reaches of the Mines. I think we have reached them
now, but it is night outside again, and we cannot tell until morning. If I am
right, tomorrow we may actually see the morning peeping in. But in the
meanwhile we had better go no further. Let us rest, if we can. Things have
gone well so far, and the greater part of the dark road is over. But we are
not through yet, and it is a long way down to the Gates that open on the
world.'
 The Company spent that night in the great cavernous hall, huddled close
together in a corner to escape the draught: there seemed to be a steady inflow
of chill air through the eastern archway. All about them as they lay hung the
darkness, hollow and immense, and they were oppressed by the loneliness and
vastness of the dolven halls and endlessly branching stairs and passages. The
wildest imaginings that dark rumour had ever suggested to the hobbits fell
altogether short of the actual dread and wonder of Moria.
 `There must have been a mighty crowd of dwarves here at one time ' said
Sam; `and every one of them busier than badgers for five hundred years to make
all this, and most in hard rock too! What did they do it all for? They didn't
live in these darksome holes surely? '
 `These are not holes,' said Gimli. `This is the great realm and city of
the Dwarrowdelf. And of old it was not darksome, but full of light and
splendour, as is still remembered in our songs.'
 He rose and standing in the dark he began to chant in a deep voice, while
the echoes ran away into the roof.
 The world was young, the mountains green,
 No stain yet on the Moon was seen,
 No words were laid on stream or stone
 When Durin woke and walked alone.
 He named the nameless hills and dells;
 He drank from yet untasted wells;
 He stooped and looked in Mirrormere,
 And saw a crown of stars appear,
 As gems upon a silver thread,
 Above the shadow of his head.
 The world was fair, the mountains tall,
 In Elder Days before the fall
 Of mighty kings in Nargothrond
 And Gondolin, who now beyond
 The Western Seas have passed away:
 The world was fair in Durin's Day.
 A king he was on carven throne
 In many-pillared halls of stone
 With golden roof and silver floor,
 And runes of power upon the door.
 The light of sun and star and moon
 In shining lamps of crystal hewn
 Undimmed by cloud or shade of night
 There shone for ever fair and bright.
 There hammer on the anvil smote,
 There chisel clove, and graver wrote;
 There forged was blade, and bound was hilt;
 The delver mined, the mason built.
 There beryl, pearl, and opal pale,
 And metal wrought like fishes' mail,
 Buckler and corslet, axe and sword,
 And shining spears were laid in hoard.
 Unwearied then were Durin's folk
 Beneath the mountains music woke:
 The harpers harped, the minstrels sang,
 And at the gates the trumpets rang.
 The world is grey, the mountains old,
 The forge's fire is ashen-cold
 No harp is wrung, no hammer falls:
 The darkness dwells in Durin's halls
 The shadow lies upon his tomb
 In Moria, in Khazad-dûm.
 But still the sunken stars appear
 In dark and windless Mirrormere;
 There lies his crown in water deep,
 Till Durin wakes again from sleep.
 `I like that! ' said Sam. `I should like to learn it. _In Moria, in
Khazad-dûm!_ But it makes the darkness seem heavier, thinking of all those
lamps. Are there piles of jewels and gold lying about here still? '
 Gimli was silent. Having sung his song he would say no more.
 `Piles of jewels? ' said Gandalf. `No. The Orcs have often plundered
Moria; there is nothing left in the upper halls. And since the dwarves fled,
no one dares to seek the shafts and treasuries down in the deep places: they
are drowned in water–or in a shadow of fear.'
 `Then what do the dwarves want to come back for? ' asked Sam.
 'For _mithril_,' answered Gandalf. `The wealth of Moria was not in gold
and jewels, the toys of the Dwarves; nor in iron, their servant. Such things
they found here, it is true, especially iron; but they did not need to delve
for them: all things that they desired they could obtain in traffic. For here
alone in the world was found Moria-silver, or true-silver as some have called
it: _mithril_ is the Elvish name. The Dwarves have a name which they do not
tell. Its worth was ten times that of gold, and now it is beyond price; for
little is left above ground, and even the Orcs dare not delve here for it. The
lodes lead away north towards Caradhras, and down to darkness. The Dwarves
tell no tale; but even as _mithril_ was the foundation of their wealth, so
also it was their destruction: they delved too greedily and too deep, and
disturbed that from which they fled, Durin's Bane. Of what they brought to
light the Orcs have gathered nearly all, and given it in tribute to Sauron,
who covets it.
 `_Mithril!_ All folk desired it. It could be beaten like copper, and
polished like glass; and the Dwarves could make of it a metal, light and yet
harder than tempered steel. Its beauty was like to that of common silver, but
the beauty of _mithril_ did not tarnish or grow dim. The Elves dearly loved
it, and among many uses they made of it _ithildin_, starmoon, which you saw
upon the doors. Bilbo had a corslet of mithril-rings that Thorin gave him. I
wonder what has become of it? Gathering dust still in Michel Delving Mathomhouse, I suppose.'
 `What? ' cried Gimli, startled out of his silence. `A corslet of Moriasilver? That was a kingly gift! '
 'Yes,' said Gandalf. `I never told him, but its worth was greater than
the value of the whole Shire and everything in it.'
 Frodo said nothing, but he put his hand under his tunic and touched the
rings of his mail-shirt. He felt staggered to think that he had been walking
about with the price of the Shire under his jacket. Had Bilbo known? He felt
no doubt that Bilbo knew quite well. It was indeed a kingly gift. But now his
thoughts had been carried away from the dark Mines, to Rivendell, to Bilbo,
and to Bag End in the days while Bilbo was still there. He wished with all his
heart that he was back there, and in those days, mowing the lawn, or pottering
among the flowers, and that he had never heard of Moria, or _mithril -_or the
Ring.
 A deep silence fell. One by one the others fell asleep. Frodo was on
guard. As if it were a breath that came in through unseen doors out of deep
places, dread came over him. His hands were cold and his brow damp. He
listened. All his mind was given to listening and nothing else for two slow
hours; but he heard no sound, not even the imagined echo of a footfall.
 His watch was nearly over, when, far off where he guessed that the
western archway stood, he fancied that he could see two pale points of light,
almost like luminous eyes. He started. His head had nodded. `I must have
nearly fallen asleep on guard,' he thought. `I was on the edge of a dream.' He
stood up and rubbed his eyes, and remained standing, peering into the dark,
until he was relieved by Legolas.
 When he lay down he quickly went to sleep, but it seemed to him that the
dream went on: he heard whispers, and saw the two pale points of light
approaching, slowly. He woke and found that the others were speaking softly
near him, and that a dim light was falling on his face. High up above the
eastern archway through a shaft near the roof came a long pale gleam; and
across the hall through the northern arch light also glimmered faint and
distantly.
 Frodo sat up. `Good morning! ' said Gandalf: `For morning it is again at
last. I was right, you see. We are high up on the east side of Moria. Before
today is over we ought to find the Great Gates and see the waters of
Mirrormere lying in the Dimrill Dale before us.'
 'I shall be glad,' said Gimli. `I have looked on Moria, and it is very
great, but it has become dark and dreadful; and we have found no sign of my
kindred. I doubt now that Balin ever came here.'
 After they had breakfasted Gandalf decided to go on again at once. `We
are tired, but we shall rest better when we are outside,' he said. `I think
that none of us will wish to spend another night in Moria.'
 `No indeed! ' said Boromir. `Which way shall we take? Yonder eastward
arch? '
 'Maybe,' said Gandalf. `But I du not know yet exactly where we are.
Unless I am quite astray, I guess that we are above and to the north of the
Great Gates; and it may not be easy to find the right road down to them. The
eastern arch will probably prove to be the way that we must take; but before
we make up our minds we ought to look about us. Let us go towards that light
in the north door. If we could find a window it would help, but I fear that
the light comes only down deep shafts.'
 Following his lead the Company passed under the northern arch. They found
themselves in a wide corridor. As they went along it the glimmer grew
stronger, and they saw that it came through a doorway on their right. It was
high and flat-topped, and the stone door was still upon its hinges, standing
half open. Beyond it was a large square chamber. It was dimly lit, but to
their eyes, after so long a time in the dark, it seemed dazzlingly bright, and
they blinked as they entered.
 Their feet disturbed a deep dust upon the floor, and stumbled among
things lying in the doorway whose shapes they could not at first make out. The
chamber was lit by a wide shaft high in the further eastern wall; it slanted
upwards and, far above, a small square patch of blue sky could be seen. The
light of the shaft fell directly on a table in the middle of the room: a
single oblong block, about two feet high, upon which was laid a great slab of
white stone.
 `It looks like a tomb,' muttered Frodo, and bent forwards with a curious
sense of foreboding, to look more closely at it. Gandalf came quickly to his
side. On the slab runes were deeply graven:
 'These are Daeron's Runes, such as were used of old in Moria,' said
Gandalf. 'Here is written in the tongues of Men and Dwarves:
 BALIN SON OF FUNDIN
 LORD OF MORIA.'
 'He is dead then,' said Frodo. `I feared it was so.' Gimli cast his hood
over his face.
 _Chapter 5_
 The Bridge of Khazad-dûm
 The Company of the Ring stood silent beside the tomb of Balin. Frodo
thought of Bilbo and his long friendship with the dwarf, and of Balin's visit
to the Shire long ago. In that dusty chamber in the mountains it seemed a
thousand years ago and on the other side of the world.
 At length they stirred and looked up, and began to search for anything
that would give them tidings of Balin's fate, or show what had become of his
folk. There was another smaller door on the other side of the chamber, under
the shaft. By both the doors they could now see that many bones were lying,
and among them were broken swords and axe-heads, and cloven shields and helms.
Some of the swords were crooked: orc-scimitars with blackened blades.
 There were many recesses cut in the rock of the walls, and in them were
large iron-bound chests of wood. All had been broken and plundered; but beside
the shattered lid of one there lay the remains of a book. It had been slashed
and stabbed and partly burned, and it was so stained with black and other dark
marks like old blood that little of it could be read. Gandalf lifted it
carefully, but the leaves crackled and broke as he laid it on the slab. He
pored over it for some time without speaking. Frodo and Gimli standing at his
side could see, as he gingerly turned the leaves, that they were written by
many different hands, in runes, both of Moria and of Dale, and here and there
in Elvish script.
 At last Gandalf looked up. 'It seems to be a record of the fortunes of
Balin's folk,' he said. `I guess that it began with their coming to Dimrill
Dale nigh on thirty years ago: the pages seem to have numbers referring to the
years after their arrival. The top page is marked _one – three_, so at least
two are missing from the beginning. Listen to this!
 '_We drove out orcs from the great gate and guard_ – I think; the next
word is blurred and burned; probably _room_ – _we slew many in the bright_ – I
think – _sun in the dale. Flói was killed by an arrow. He slew the great_.
Then there is a blur followed by _Flói under grass near Mirror mere_. The next
line or two I cannot read. Then comes _We have taken the twentyfirst hall of
North end to dwell in. There is_I cannot read what. A _shaft_ is mentioned.
Then _Balin has set up his seat in the Chamber of Mazarbul_.'
 'The Chamber of Records,' said Gimli. `I guess that is where we now
stand.'
 `Well, I can read no more for a long way,' said Gandalf, 'except the word
_gold_, and _Durin's Axe_ and something _helm_. Then _Balin is now lord of
Moria_. That seems to end a chapter. After some stars another hand begins, and
I can see _we found truesilver_, and later the word _wellforged_ and then
something, I have it! _mithril_; and the last two lines _Óin to seek for the
upper armouries of Third Deep_, something _go westwards_, a blur,_ to Hollin
gate_.'
 Gandalf paused and set a few leaves aside. 'There are several pages of
the same sort, rather hastily written and much damaged, he said; `but I can
make little of them in this light. Now there must be a number of leaves
missing, because they begin to be numbered _five_, the fifth year of the
colony, I suppose. Let me see! No, they are too cut and stained; I cannot read
them. We might do better in the sunlight. Wait! Here is something: a large
bold hand using an Elvish script.'
 'That would be Ori's hand,' said Gimli, looking over the wizard's arm.
`He could write well and speedily, and often used the Elvish characters.'
 `I fear he had ill tidings to record in a fair hand,' said Gandalf. 'The
first clear word is _sorrow_, but the rest of the line is lost, unless it ends
in _estre_. Yes, it must be _yestre_ followed by _day being the tenth of
novembre Balin lord of Moria fell in Dimrill Dale. He went alone to look in
Mirror mere. an orc shot him from behind a stone. we slew the orc, hut many
more ... up from east up the Silverlode_. The remainder of the page is so
blurred that I can hardly make anything out, but I think I can read_ we have
barred the gates_, and then _can hold them long if_, and then perhaps
_horrible_ and _suffer_. Poor Balin! He seems to have kept the title that he
took for less than five years. I wonder what happened afterwards; but there is
no time to puzzle out the last few pages. Here is the last page of all.' He
paused and sighed.
 `It is grim reading,' he said. 'I fear their end was cruel. Listen! _We
cannot get out. We cannot get out. They have taken the Bridge and second hall.
Frár and Lóni and Náli fell there_. Then there are four lines smeared so that
I can only _read went 5 days ago_. The last lines _run the pool is up to the
wall at Westgate. The Watcher in the Water took Óin. We cannot get out. The
end comes_, and then_ drums, drums in the deep_. I wonder what that means. The
last thing written is in a trailing scrawl of elf-letters: _they are coming_.
There is nothing more.' Gandalf paused and stood in silent thought.
 A sudden dread and a horror of the chamber fell on the Company. `_We
cannot get out_,' muttered Gimli. 'It was well for us that the pool had sunk a
little, and that the Watcher was sleeping down at the southern end.'
 Gandalf raised his head and looked round. `They seem to have made a last
stand by both doors,' he said; 'but there were not many left by that time. So
ended the attempt to retake Moria! It was valiant but foolish. The time is not
come yet. Now, I fear, we must say farewell to Balin son of Fundin. Here he
must lie in the halls of his fathers. We will take this book, the Book of
Mazarbul, and look at it more closely later. You had better keep it, Gimli,
and take it back to Dáin, if you get a chance. It will interest him, though it
will grieve him deeply. Come, let us go! The morning is passing.'
 'Which way shall we go? ' asked Boromir.
 'Back to the hall,' answered Gandalf. 'But our visit to this room has not
been in vain. I now know where we are. This must be, as Gimli says, the
Chamber of Mazarbul; and the hall must be the twenty-first of the North-end.
Therefore we should leave by the eastern arch of the hall, and bear right and
south, and go downwards. The Twenty-first Hall should be on the Seventh Level,
that is six above the level of the Gates. Come now! Back to the hall! '
 Gandalf had hardly spoken these words, when there came a great noise: a
rolling _Boom_ that seemed to come from depths far below, and to tremble in
the stone at their feet. They sprang towards the door in alarm. _Doom, doom_
it rolled again, as if huge hands were turning the very caverns of Moria into
a vast drum. Then there came an echoing blast: a great horn was blown in the
hall, and answering horns and harsh cries were heard further off. There was a
hurrying sound of many feet.
 `They are coming! ' cried Legolas.
 'We cannot get out,' said Gimli.
 `Trapped! ' cried Gandalf. `Why did I delay? Here we are, caught, just as
they were before. But I was not here then. We will see what –––-'
 _Doom, doom_ came the drum-beat and the walls shook.
 'Slam the doors and wedge them! ' shouted Aragorn. 'And keep your packs
on as long as you can: we may get a chance to cut our way out yet.'
 `No! ' said Gandalf. 'We must not get shut in. Keep the east door ajar!
We will go that way, if we get a chance.'
 Another harsh horn-call and shrill cries rang out. Feet were coming down
the corridor. There was a ring and clatter as the Company drew their swords.
Glamdring shone with a pale light, and Sting glinted at the edges. Boromir set
his shoulder against the western door.
 `Wait a moment! Do not close it yet! ' said Gandalf. He sprang forward to
Boromir's side and drew himself up to his full height.
 'Who comes hither to disturb the rest of Balin Lord of Moria? ' he cried
in a loud voice.
 There was a rush of hoarse laughter, like the fall of sliding stones into
a pit; amid the clamour a deep voice was raised in command. Doom, boom, doom
went the drums in the deep.
 With a quick movement Gandalf stepped before the narrow opening of the
door and thrust forward his staff: There was a dazzling flash that lit the
chamber and the passage outside. For an instant the wizard looked out. Arrows
whined and whistled down the corridor as he sprang back.
 'There are Orcs, very many of them,' he said. `And some are large and
evil: black Uruks of Mordor. For the moment they are hanging back, but there
is something else there. A great cave-troll, I think, or more than one. There
is no hope of escape that way.'
 'And no hope at all, if they come at the other door as well,' said
Boromir.
 'There is no sound outside here yet,' said Aragorn, who was standing by
the eastern door listening. `The passage on this side plunges straight down a
stair: it plainly does not lead back towards the hall. But it is no good
flying blindly this way with the pursuit just behind. We cannot block the
door. Its key is gone and the lock is broken, and it opens inwards. We must do
something to delay the enemy first. We will make them fear the Chamber of
Mazarbul!' he said grimly feeling the edge of his sword, Andúril.
 Heavy feet were heard in the corridor. Boromir flung himself against the
door and heaved it to; then he wedged it with broken sword-blades and
splinters of wood. The Company retreated to the other side of the chamber. But
they had no chance to fly yet. There was a blow on the door that made it
quiver; and then it began to grind slowly open, driving back the wedges. A
huge arm and shoulder, with a dark skin of greenish scales, was thrust through
the widening gap. Then a great, flat, toeless foot was forced through below.
There was a dead silence outside.
 Boromir leaped forward and hewed at the arm with all his might; but his
sword rang, glanced aside, and fell from his shaken hand. The blade was
notched.
 Suddenly, and to his own surprise, Frodo felt a hot wrath blaze up in his
heart. `The Shire! ' he cried, and springing beside Boromir, he stooped, and
stabbed with Sting at the hideous foot. There was a bellow, and the foot
jerked back, nearly wrenching Sting from Frodo's arm. Black drops dripped from
the blade and smoked on the floor. Boromir hurled himself against the door and
slammed it again.
 `One for the Shire! ' cried Aragorn. `The hobbit's bite is deep! You have
a good blade, Frodo son of Drogo! '
 There was a crash on the door, followed by crash after crash. Rams and
hammers were beating against it. It cracked and staggered back, and the
opening grew suddenly wide. Arrows came whistling in, but struck the northern
wall, and fell harmlessly to the floor. There was a horn-blast and a rush of
feet, and orcs one after another leaped into the chamber.
 How many there were the Company could not count. The affray was sharp,
but the orcs were dismayed by the fierceness of the defence. Legolas shot two
through the throat. Gimli hewed the legs from under another that had sprung up
on Balin's tomb. Boromir and Aragorn slew many. When thirteen had fallen the
rest fled shrieking. leaving the defenders unharmed, except for Sam who had a
scratch along the scalp. A quick duck had saved him; and he had felled his
orc: a sturdy thrust with his Barrow-blade. A fire was smouldering in his
brown eyes that would have made Ted Sandyman step backwards, if he had seen
it.
 `Now is the time! ' cried Gandalf. `Let us go, before the troll returns!'
 But even as they retreated, and before Pippin and Merry had reached the
stair outside, a huge orc-chieftain, almost man-high, clad in black mail from
head to foot, leaped into the chamber; behind him his followers clustered in
the doorway. His broad flat face was swart, his eyes were like coals, and his
tongue was red; he wielded a great spear. With a thrust of his huge hide
shield he turned Boromir's sword and bore him backwards, throwing him to the
ground. Diving under Aragorn's blow with the speed of a striking snake he
charged into the Company and thrust with his spear straight at Frodo. The blow
caught him on the right side, and Frodo was hurled against the wall and
pinned. Sam, with a cry, hacked at the spear-shaft, and it broke. But even as
the orc flung down the truncheon and swept out his scimitar, Andúril came down
upon his helm. There was a flash like flame and the helm burst asunder. The
orc fell with cloven head. His followers fled howling, as Boromir and Aragorn
sprang at them.
 _Doom, doom_ went the drums in the deep. The great voice rolled out
again.
 'Now! ' shouted Gandalf. 'Now is the last chance. Run for it! '
 Aragorn picked up Frodo where he lay by the wall and made for the stair,
pushing Merry and Pippin in front of him. The others followed; but Gimli had
to be dragged away by Legolas: in spite of the peril he lingered by Balin's
tomb with his head bowed. Boromir hauled the eastern door to, grinding upon
its hinges: it had great iron rings on either side, but could not be fastened.
 'I am all right,' gasped Frodo. `I can walk. Put me down! '
 Aragorn nearly dropped him in his amazement. 'I thought you were dead! '
he cried.
 'Not yet! ' said Gandalf. 'But there is time for wonder. Off you go, all
of you, down the stairs! Wait a few minutes for me at the bottom, but if I do
not come soon, go on! Go quickly and choose paths leading right and
downwards.'
 'We cannot leave you to hold the door alone! ' said Aragorn.
 `Do as I say! ' said Gandalf fiercely. `Swords are no more use here. Go!'
 The passage was lit by no shaft and was utterly dark. They groped their
way down a long flight of steps, and then looked back; but they could see
nothing, except high above them the faint glimmer of the wizard's staff. He
seemed to be still standing on guard by the closed door. Frodo breathed
heavily and leaned against Sam, who put his arms about him. They stood peering
up the stairs into the darkness. Frodo thought he could hear the voice of
Gandalf above, muttering words that ran down the sloping roof with a sighing
echo. He could not catch what was said. The walls seemed to be trembling.
Every now and again the drum-beats throbbed and rolled: _doom, doom_.
 Suddenly at the top of the stair there was a stab of white light. Then
there was a dull rumble and a heavy thud. The drum-beats broke out wildly:
_doom-boom, doom-boom_, and then stopped. Gandalf came flying down the steps
and fell to the ground in the midst of the Company.
 `Well, well! That's over! ' said the wizard struggling to his feet. `I
have done all that I could. But I have met my match, and have nearly been
destroyed. But don't stand here! Go on! You will have to do without light for
a while: I am rather shaken. Go on! Go on! Where are you, Gimli? Come ahead
with me! Keep close behind, all of you!'
 They stumbled after him wondering what had happened. _Doom, doom_ went
the drum-beats again: they now sounded muffled and far away, but they were
following. There was no other sound of pursuit, neither tramp of feet, nor any
voice. Gandalf took no turns, right or left, for the passage seemed to be
going in the direction that he desired. Every now and again it descended a
flight of steps, fifty or more, to a lower level. At the moment that was their
chief danger; for in the dark they could not see a descent, until they came on
it, and put their feet out into emptiness. Gandalf felt the ground with his
staff like a blind man.
 At the end of an hour they had gone a mile, or maybe a little more, and
had descended many flights of stairs. There was still no sound of pursuit.
Almost they began to hope that they would escape. At the bottom of the seventh
flight Gandalf halted.
 `It is getting hot! ' he gasped. `We ought to be down at least to the
level of the Gates now. Soon I think we should look for a left-hand turn to
take us east. I hope it is not far. I am very weary. I must rest here a
moment, even if all the orcs ever spawned are after us.'
 Gimli took his arm and helped him down to a seat on the step. `What
happened away up there at the door? ' he asked. `Did you meet the beater of
the drums? '
 'I do not know,' answered Gandalf. `But I found myself suddenly faced by
something that I have not met before. I could think of nothing to do but to
try and put a shutting-spell on the door. I know many; but to do things of
that kind rightly requires time, and even then the door can be broken by
strength.
 `As I stood there I could hear orc-voices on the other side: at any
moment I thought they would burst it open. I could not hear what was said;
they seemed to be talking in their own hideous language. All I caught was
_ghâsh;_ that is "fire". Then something came into the chamber – I felt it
through the door, and the orcs themselves were afraid and fell silent. It laid
hold of the iron ring, and then it perceived me and my spell.
 'What it was I cannot guess, but I have never felt such a challenge. The
counter-spell was terrible. It nearly broke me. For an instant the door left
my control and began to open! I had to speak a word of Command. That proved
too great a strain. The door burst in pieces. Something dark as a cloud was
blocking out all the light inside, and I was thrown backwards down the stairs.
All the wall gave way, and the roof of the chamber as well, I think.
 `I am afraid Balin is buried deep, and maybe something else is buried
there too. I cannot say. But at least the passage behind us was completely
blocked. Ah! I have never felt so spent, but it is passing. And now what about
you, Frodo? There was not time to say so, but I have never been more delighted
in my life than when you spoke. I feared that it was a brave but dead hobbit
that Aragorn was carrying.'
 `What about me? ' said Frodo. 'I am alive, and whole I think. I am
bruised and in pain, but it is not too bad.'
 `Well,' said Aragorn, `I can only say that hobbits are made of a stuff so
tough that I have never met the like of it. Had I known, I would have spoken
softer in the Inn at Bree! That spear-thrust would have skewered a wild boar!
'
 'Well, it did not skewer me, I am glad to say,' said Frodo; `though I
feel as if I had been caught between a hammer and an anvil.' He said no more.
He found breathing painful.
 'You take after Bilbo,' said Gandalf. `There is more about you than meets
the eye, as I said of him long ago.' Frodo wondered if the remark meant more
than it said.
 They now went on again. Before long Gimli spoke. He had keen eyes in the
dark. `I think,' he said, `that there is a light ahead. But it is not
daylight. It is red. What can it be? '
 `_Ghâsh!_' muttered Gandalf. `I wonder if that is what they meant: that
the lower levels are on fire? Still, we can only go on.'
 Soon the light became unmistakable, and could be seen by all. It was
flickering and glowing on the walls away down the passage before them. They
could now see their way: in front the road sloped down swiftly, and some way
ahead there stood a low archway; through it the glowing light came. The air
became very hot.
 When they came to the arch Gandalf went through, signing to them to wait.
As he stood just beyond the opening they saw his face lit by a red glow.
Quickly he stepped back.
 `There is some new devilry here,' he said, 'devised for our welcome no
doubt. But I know now where we are: we have reached the First Deep, the level
immediately below the Gates. This is the Second Hall of Old Moria; and the
Gates are near: away beyond the eastern end, on the left, not more than a
quarter of a mile. Across the Bridge, up a broad stair, along a wide road
through the First Hall, and out! But come and look! '
 They peered out. Before them was another cavernous hall. It was loftier
and far longer than the one in which they had slept. They were near its
eastern end; westward it ran away into darkness. Down the centre stalked a
double line of towering pillars. They were carved like boles of mighty trees
whose boughs upheld the roof with a branching tracery of stone. Their stems
were smooth and black, but a red glow was darkly mirrored in their sides.
Right across the floor, close to the feet of two huge pillars a great fissure
had opened. Out of it a fierce red light came, and now and again flames licked
at the brink and curled about the bases of the columns. Wisps of dark smoke
wavered in the hot air.
 'If we had come by the main road down from the upper halls, we should
have been trapped here,' said Gandalf. `Let us hope that the fire now lies
between us and pursuit. Come! There is no time to lose.'
 Even as he spoke they heard again the pursuing drum-beat: _Doom, doom,
doom_. Away beyond the shadows at the western end of the hall there came cries
and horn-calls. _Doom, doom_: the pillars seemed to tremble and the flames to
quiver.
 `Now for the last race! ' said Gandalf. 'If the sun is shining outside we
may still escape. After me! '
 He turned left and sped across the smooth floor of the hall. The distance
was greater than it had looked. As they ran they heard the beat and echo of
many hurrying feet behind. A shrill yell went up: they had been seen. There
was a ring and clash of steel. An arrow whistled over Frodo's head.
 Boromir laughed. `They did not expect this,' he said. `The fire has cut
them off. We are on the wrong side! '
 `Look ahead! ' called Gandalf. `The Bridge is near. It is dangerous and
narrow.'
 Suddenly Frodo saw before him a black chasm. At the end of the hall the
floor vanished and fell to an unknown depth. The outer door could only be
reached by a slender bridge of stone, without kerb or rail, that spanned the
chasm with one curving spring of fifty feet. It was an ancient defence of the
Dwarves against any enemy that might capture the First Hall and the outer
passages. They could only pass across it in single file. At the brink Gandalf
halted and the others came up in a pack behind.
 'Lead the way, Gimli! ' he said. 'Pippin and Merry next. Straight on and
up the stair beyond the door! '
 Arrows fell among them. One struck Frodo and sprang back. Another pierced
Gandalf's hat and stuck there like a black feather. Frodo looked behind.
Beyond the fire he saw swarming black figures: there seemed to be hundreds of
orcs. They brandished spears and scimitars which shone red as blood in the
firelight. _Doom, doom_ rolled the drum-beats, growing louder and louder,
_doom, doom_.
 Legolas turned and set an arrow to the string, though it was a long shot
for his small bow. He drew, but his hand fell, and the arrow slipped to the
ground. He gave a cry of dismay and fear. Two great trolls appeared; they bore
great slabs of stone, and flung them down to serve as gangways over the fire.
But it was not the trolls that had filled the Elf with terror. The ranks of
the orcs had opened, and they crowded away, as if they themselves were afraid.
Something was coming up behind them. What it was could not be seen: it was
like a great shadow, in the middle of which was a dark form, of man-shape
maybe, yet greater; and a power and terror seemed to be in it and to go before
it.
 It came to the edge of the fire and the light faded as if a cloud had
bent over it. Then with a rush it leaped across the fissure. The flames roared
up to greet it, and wreathed about it; and a black smoke swirled in the air.
Its streaming mane kindled, and blazed behind it. In its right hand was a
blade like a stabbing tongue of fire; in its left it held a whip of many
thongs.
 'Ai! ai! ' wailed Legolas. 'A Balrog! A Balrog is come! '
 Gimli stared with wide eyes. `Durin's Bane! ' he cried, and letting his
axe fall he covered his face.
 'A Balrog,' muttered Gandalf. `Now I understand.' He faltered and leaned
heavily on his staff. `What an evil fortune! And I am already weary.'
 The dark figure streaming with fire raced towards them. The orcs yelled
and poured over the stone gangways. Then Boromir raised his horn and blew.
Loud the challenge rang and bellowed, like the shout of many throats under the
cavernous roof. For a moment the orcs quailed and the fiery shadow halted.
Then the echoes died as suddenly as a flame blown out by a dark wind, and the
enemy advanced again.
 'Over the bridge!' cried Gandalf, recalling his strength. `Fly! This is a
foe beyond any of you. I must hold the narrow way. Fly! ' Aragorn and Boromir
did not heed the command, but still held their ground, side by side, behind
Gandalf at the far end of the bridge. The others halted just within the
doorway at the hall's end, and turned, unable to leave their leader to face
the enemy alone.
 The Balrog reached the bridge. Gandalf stood in the middle of the span,
leaning on the staff in his left hand, but in his other hand Glamdring
gleamed, cold and white. His enemy halted again, facing him, and the shadow
about it reached out like two vast wings. It raised the whip, and the thongs
whined and cracked. Fire came from its nostrils. But Gandalf stood firm.
 `You cannot pass,' he said. The orcs stood still, and a dead silence
fell. `I am a servant of the Secret Fire, wielder of the flame of Anor. You
cannot pass. The dark fire will not avail you, flame of Udûn. Go back to the
Shadow! You cannot pass.'
 The Balrog made no answer. The fire in it seemed to die, but the darkness
grew. It stepped forward slowly on to the bridge, and suddenly it drew itself
up to a great height, and its wings were spread from wall to wall; but still
Gandalf could be seen, glimmering in the gloom; he seemed small, and
altogether alone: grey and bent, like a wizened tree before the onset of a
storm.
 From out of the shadow a red sword leaped flaming.
 Glamdring glittered white in answer.
 There was a ringing clash and a stab of white fire. The Balrog fell back
and its sword flew up in molten fragments. The wizard swayed on the bridge,
stepped back a pace, and then again stood still.
 'You cannot pass! ' he said.
 With a bound the Balrog leaped full upon the bridge. Its whip whirled and
hissed.
 'He cannot stand alone! ' cried Aragorn suddenly and ran back along the
bridge. '_Elendil!_' he shouted. 'I am with you, Gandalf! '
 `Gondor! ' cried Boromir and leaped after him.
 At that moment Gandalf lifted his staff, and crying aloud he smote the
bridge before him. The staff broke asunder and fell from his hand. A blinding
sheet of white flame sprang up. The bridge cracked. Right at the Balrog's feet
it broke, and the stone upon which it stood crashed into the gulf, while the
rest remained, poised, quivering like a tongue of rock thrust out into
emptiness.
 With a terrible cry the Balrog fell forward, and its shadow plunged down
and vanished. But even as it fell it swung its whip, and the thongs lashed and
curled about the wizard's knees, dragging him to the brink. He staggered and
fell, grasped vainly at the stone, and slid into the abyss. 'Fly, you fools!
' he cried, and was gone.
 The fires went out, and blank darkness fell. The Company stood rooted
with horror staring into the pit. Even as Aragorn and Boromir came flying
back, the rest of the bridge cracked and fell. With a cry Aragorn roused them.
 'Come! I will lead you now! ' he called. 'We must obey his last command.
Follow me! '
 They stumbled wildly up the great stairs beyond the door. Aragorn
leading, Boromir at the rear. At the top was a wide echoing passage. Along
this they fled. Frodo heard Sam at his side weeping, and then he found that he
himself was weeping as he ran. _Doom, doom, doom_ the drum-beats rolled
behind, mournful now and slow; _doom!_
 They ran on. The light grew before them; great shafts pierced the roof.
They ran swifter. They passed into a hall, bright with daylight from its high
windows in the east. They fled across it. Through its huge broken doors they
passed, and suddenly before them the Great Gates opened, an arch of blazing
light.
 There was a guard of orcs crouching in the shadows behind the great door
posts towering on either side, but the gates were shattered and cast down.
Aragorn smote to the ground the captain that stood in his path, and the rest
fled in terror of his wrath. The Company swept past them and took no heed of
them. Out of the Gates they ran and sprang down the huge and age-worn steps,
the threshold of Moria.
 Thus, at last, they came beyond hope under the sky and felt the wind on
their faces.
 They did not halt until they were out of bowshot from the walls. Dimrill
Dale lay about them. The shadow of the Misty Mountains lay upon it, but
eastwards there was a golden light on the land. It was but one hour after
noon. The sun was shining; the clouds were white and high.
 They looked back. Dark yawned the archway of the Gates under the
mountain-shadow. Faint and far beneath the earth rolled the slow drum-beats:
_doom_. A thin black smoke trailed out. Nothing else was to be seen; the dale
all around was empty. _Doom_. Grief at last wholly overcame them, and they
wept long: some standing and silent, some cast upon the ground. _Doom, doom_.
The drum-beats faded.
 _Chapter 6_
 Lothlórien
 'Alas! I Fear we cannot stay here longer,' said Aragorn. He looked
towards the mountains and held up his sword. `Farewell, Gandalf! ' he cried.
'Did I not say to you: _if you pass the doors of Moria, beware_? Alas that I
spoke true! What hope have we without you? '
 He turned to the Company. `We must do without hope,' he said. `At least
we may yet be avenged. Let us gird ourselves and weep no more! Come! We have a
long road, and much to do.'
 They rose and looked about them. Northward the dale ran up into a glen of
shadows between two great arms of the mountains, above which three white peaks
were shining: Celebdil, Fanuidhol, Caradhras. the Mountains of Moria. At the
head of the glen a torrent flowed like a white lace over an endless ladder of
short falls, and a mist of foam hung in the air about the mountains' feet.
 `Yonder is the Dimrill Stair,' said Aragorn, pointing to the falls. 'Down
the deep-cloven way that climbs beside the torrent we should have come, if
fortune had been kinder.'
 `Or Caradhras less cruel,' said Gimli. `There he stands smiling in the
sun! ' He shook his fist at the furthest of the snow-capped peaks and turned
away.
 To the east the outflung arm of the mountains marched to a sudden end,
and far lands could be descried beyond them, wide and vague. To the south the
Misty Mountains receded endlessly as far as sight could reach. Less than a
mile away, and a little below them, for they still stood high up on the west
side of the dale, there lay a mere. It was long and oval, shaped like a great
spear-head thrust deep into the northern glen; but its southern end was beyond
the shadows under the sunlit sky. Yet its waters were dark: a deep blue like
clear evening sky seen from a lamp-lit room. Its face was still and unruffled.
About it lay a smooth sward, shelving down on all sides to its bare unbroken
rim.
 `There lies the Mirrormere, deep Kheled-zâram! ' said Gimli sadly. `I
remember that he said: "May you have joy of the sight! But we cannot linger
there." Now long shall I journey ere I have joy again. It is I that must
hasten away, and he that must remain.'
 The Company now went down the road from the Gates. It was rough and
broken, fading to a winding track between heather and whin that thrust amid
the cracking stones. But still it could be seen that once long ago a great
paved way had wound upwards from the lowlands of the Dwarf-kingdom. In places
there were ruined works of stone beside the path, and mounds of green topped
with slender birches, or fir-trees sighing in the wind. An eastward bend led
them hard by the sward of Mirrormere, and there not far from the roadside
stood a single column broken at the top.
 'That is Durin's Stone! ' cried Gimli. `I cannot pass without turning
aside for a moment to look at the wonder of the dale! '
 `Be swift then! ' said Aragorn, looking back towards the Gates. `The Sun
sinks early. The Orcs will not, maybe, come out till after dusk, but we must
be far away before nightfall. The Moon is almost spent, and it will be dark
tonight.'
 'Come with me, Frodo! ' cried the dwarf, springing from the road. `I
would not have you go without seeing Kheled-zâram.' He ran down the long green
slope. Frodo followed slowly, drawn by the still blue water in spite of hurt
and weariness; Sam came up behind.
 Beside the standing stone Gimli halted and looked up. It was cracked and
weather-worn, and the faint runes upon its side could not be read. `This
pillar marks the spot where Durin first looked in the Mirrormere,' said the
dwarf. 'Let us look ourselves once, ere we go!'
 They stooped over the dark water. At first they could see nothing. Then
slowly they saw the forms of the encircling mountains mirrored in a profound
blue, and the peaks were like plumes of white flame above them; beyond there
was a space of sky. There like jewels sunk in the deep shone glinting stars,
though sunlight was in the sky above. Of their own stooping forms no shadow
could be seen.
 'O Kheled-zâram fair and wonderful! ' said Gimli. `There lies the Crown
of Durin till he wakes. Farewell! ' He bowed, and turned away, and hastened
back up the green-sward to the road again.
 `What did you see? ' said Pippin to Sam, but Sam was too deep in thought
to answer.
 The road now turned south and went quickly downwards, running out from
between the arms of the dale. Some way below the mere they came on a deep well
of water, clear as crystal, from which a freshet fell over a stone lip and ran
glistening and gurgling down a steep rocky channel.
 'Here is the spring from which the Silverlode rises.' said Gimli. `Do not
drink of it! It is icy cold.'
 'Soon it becomes a swift river, and it gathers water from many other
mountain-streams,' said Aragorn. `Our road leads beside it for many miles. For
I shall take you by the road that Gandalf chose, and first I hope to come to
the woods where the Silverlode flows into the Great River-out yonder.' They
looked as he pointed, and before them they could see the stream leaping down
to the trough of the valley, and then running on and away into the lower
lands, until it was lost in a golden haze.
 `There lie the woods of Lothlórien! ' said Legolas. `That is the fairest
of all the dwellings of my people. There are no trees like the trees of that
land. For in the autumn their leaves fall not, but turn to gold. Not till the
spring comes and the new green opens do they fall, and then the boughs are
laden with yellow flowers; and the floor of the wood is golden, and golden is
the roof, and its pillars are of silver, for the bark of the trees is smooth
and grey. So still our songs in Mirkwood say. My heart would be glad if I were
beneath the eaves of that wood, and it were springtime! '
 `My heart will be glad, even in the winter,' said Aragorn. 'But it lies
many miles away. Let us hasten! '
 For some time Frodo and Sam managed to keep up with the others; but
Aragorn was leading them at a great pace, and after a while they lagged
behind. They had eaten nothing since the early morning. Sam's cut was burning
like fire, and his head felt light. In spite of the shining sun the wind
seemed chill after the warm darkness of Moria. He shivered. Frodo felt every
step more painful and he gasped for breath.
 At last Legolas turned, and seeing them now far behind, he spoke to
Aragorn. The others halted, and Aragorn ran back, calling to Boromir to come
with him.
 'I am sorry, Frodo! ' he cried, full of concern. `So much has happened
this day and we have such need of haste, that I have forgotten that you were
hurt; and Sam too. You should have spoken. We have done nothing to ease you,
as we ought, though all the orcs of Moria were after us. Come now! A little
further on there is a place where we can rest for a little. There I will do
what I can for you. Come, Boromir! We will carry them.'
 Soon afterwards they came upon another stream that ran down from the
west, and joined its bubbling water with the hurrying Silverlode. Together
they plunged over a fall of green-hued stone, and foamed down into a dell.
About it stood fir-trees, short and bent, and its sides were steep and clothed
with harts-tongue and shrubs of whortle-berry. At the bottom there was a level
space through which the stream flowed noisily over shining pebbles. Here they
rested. It was now nearly three hours after noon, and they had come only a few
miles from the Gates. Already the sun was westering.
 While Gimli and the two younger hobbits kindled a fire of brush- and firwood, and drew water, Aragorn
tended Sam and Frodo. Sam's wound was not deep,
but it looked ugly, and Aragorn's face was grave as he examined it. After a
moment he looked up with relief.
 'Good luck, Sam! ' he said. 'Many have received worse than this in
payment for the slaying of their first orc. The cut is not poisoned, as the
wounds of orc-blades too often are. It should heal well when I have tended it.
Bathe it when Gimli has heated water.'
 He opened his pouch and drew out some withered leaves. `They are dry and
some of their virtue has one, he said, but here I have still some of the
leaves of _athelas_ that I gathered near Weathertop. Crush one in the water,
and wash the wound clean, and I will bind it. Now it is your turn. Frodo! '
 'I am all right,' said Frodo, reluctant to have his garments touched.
`AII I needed was some food and a little rest.'
 `No! ' said Aragorn. `We must have a look and see what the hammer and the
anvil have done to you. I still marvel that you are alive at all.' Gently he
stripped off Frodo's old jacket and worn tunic, and gave a gasp of wonder.
Then he laughed. The silver corslet shimmered before his eyes like the light
upon a rippling sea. Carefully he took it off and held it up, and the gems on
it glittered like stars. and the sound of the shaken rings was like the tinkle
of rain in a pool.
 `Look, my friends!' he called. `Here's a pretty hobbit-skin to wrap an
elven-princeling in! If it were known that hobbits had such hides, all the
hunters of Middle-earth would be riding to the Shire.'
 `And all the arrows of all the hunters in the world would be in vain,'
said Gimli, gazing at the mail in wonder. `It is a mithril-coat. Mithril! I
have never seen or heard tell of one so fair. Is this the coat that Gandalf
spoke of? Then he undervalued it. But it was well given! '
 `I have often wondered what you and Bilbo were doing, so close in his
little room,' said Merry. 'Bless the old hobbit! I love him more than ever. I
hope we get a chance of telling him about it! '
 There was a dark and blackened bruise on Frodo's right side and breast.
Under the mail there was a shirt of soft leather, but at one point the rings
had been driven through it into the flesh. Frodo's left side also was scored
and bruised where he had been hurled against the wall. While the others set
the food ready. Aragorn bathed the hurts with water in which athelas was
steeped. The pungent fragrance filled the dell, and all those who stooped over
the steaming water felt refreshed and strengthened. Soon Frodo felt the pain
leave him, and his breath grew easy: though he was stiff and sore to the touch
for many days. Aragorn bound some soft pads of cloth at his side.
 `The mail is marvellously light,' he said. `Put it on again, if you can
bear it. My heart is glad to know that you have such a coat. Do not lay it
aside, even in sleep, unless fortune brings you where you are safe for a
while; and that will seldom chance while your quest lasts.'
 When they had eaten, the Company got ready to go on. They put out the
fire and hid all traces of it. Then climbing out of the dell they took to the
road again. They had not gone far before the sun sank behind the westward
heights and great shadows crept down the mountain-sides. Dusk veiled their
feet, and mist rose in the hollows. Away in the east the evening light lay
pale upon the dim lands of distant plain and wood. Sam and Frodo now feeling
eased and greatly refreshed were able to go at a fair pace, and with only one
brief halt Aragorn led the Company on for nearly three more hours.
 It was dark. Deep night had fallen. There were many clear stars, hut the
fast-waning moon would not be seen till late. Gimli and Frodo were at the
rear, walking softly and not speaking, listening for any sound upon the road
behind. At length Gimli broke the silence.
 'Not a sound but the wind,' he said. `There are no goblins near, or my
ears are made of wood. It is to be hoped that the Orcs will be content with
driving us from Moria. And maybe that was all their purpose, and they had
nothing else to do with us-with the Ring. Though Orcs will often pursue foes
for many leagues into the plain, if they have a fallen captain to avenge.'
 Frodo did not answer. He looked at Sting, and the blade was dull. Yet he
had heard something, or thought he had. As soon as the shadows had fallen
about them and the road behind was dim, he had heard again the quick patter of
feet. Even now he heard it. He turned swiftly. There were two tiny gleams of
light behind, or for a moment he thought he saw them, but at once they slipped
aside and vanished.
 `What is it? ' said the dwarf.
 `I don't know.' answered Frodo. 'I thought I heard feet, and I thought I
saw a light-like eyes. I have thought so often, since we first entered Moria.'
 Gimli halted and stooped to the ground. 'I hear nothing but the nightspeech of plant and stone,' he
said. 'Come! Let us hurry! The others are out
of sight.'
 The night-wind blew chill up the valley to meet them. Before them a wide
grey shadow loomed, and they heard an endless rustle of leaves like poplars in
the breeze.
 `Lothlórien! ' cried Legolas. 'Lothlórien! We have come to the eaves of
the Golden Wood. Alas that it is winter! '
 Under the night the trees stood tall before them, arched over the road
and stream that ran suddenly beneath their spreading boughs. In the dim light
of the stars their stems were grey, and their quivering leaves a hint of
fallow gold.
 'Lothlórien! ' said Aragorn. 'Glad I am to hear again the wind in the
trees! We are still little more than five leagues from the Gates, but we can
go no further. Here let us hope that the virtue of the Elves will keep us
tonight from the peril that comes behind.'
 `If Elves indeed still dwell here in the darkening world,' said Gimli.
 'It is long since any of my own folk journeyed hither back to the land
whence we wandered in ages long ago,' said Legolas, 'but we hear that Lórien
is not yet deserted, for there is a secret power here that holds evil from the
land. Nevertheless its folk are seldom seen, and maybe they dwell now deep in
the woods and far from the northern border.'
 'Indeed deep in the wood they dwell,' said Aragorn, and sighed as if some
memory stirred in him. `We must fend for ourselves tonight. We will go forward
a short way, until the trees are all about us, and then we will turn aside
from the path and seek a place to rest in.'
 He stepped forward; but Boromir stood irresolute and did not follow. 'Is
there no other way? ' he said.
 `What other fairer way would you desire? ' said Aragorn.
 `A plain road, though it led through a hedge of swords,' said Boromir.
`By strange paths has this Company been led, and so far to evil fortune.
Against my will we passed under the shades of Moria, to our loss. And now we
must enter the Golden Wood, you say. But of that perilous land we have heard
in Gondor, and it is said that few come out who once go in; and of that few
none have escaped unscathed.'
 `Say not _unscathed_, but if you say _unchanged_, then maybe you will
speak the truth said Aragorn. But lore wanes in Gondor, Boromir, if in the
city of those who once were wise they now speak evil of Lothlórien. Believe
what you will, there is no other way for us – unless you would go back to
Moria-gate, or scale the pathless mountains, or swim the Great River all
alone.'
 `Then lead on! ' said Boromir. `But it is perilous.'
 `Perilous indeed,' said Aragorn, 'fair and perilous; but only evil need
fear it, or those who bring some evil with them. Follow me! '
 They had gone little more than a mile into the forest when they came upon
another stream flowing down swiftly from the tree-clad slopes that climbed
back westward towards the mountains. They heard it splashing over a fall away
among the shadows on their right. Its dark hurrying waters ran across the path
before them, and joined the Silverlode in a swirl of dim pools among the roots
of trees.
 `Here is Nimrodel! ' said Legolas. 'Of this stream the Silvan Elves made
many songs long ago, and still we sing them in the North, remembering the
rainbow on its falls, and the golden flowers that floated in its foam. All is
dark now and the Bridge of Nimrodel is broken down. I will bathe my feet, for
it is said that the water is healing to the weary.' He went forward and
climbed down the deep-cloven bank and stepped into the stream.
 `Follow me!' he cried. 'The water is not deep. Let us wade across! On the
further bank we can rest. and the sound of the falling water may bring us
sleep and forgetfulness of grief.'
 One by one they climbed down and followed Legolas. For a moment Frodo
stood near the brink and let the water flow over his tired feet. It was cold
but its touch was clean, and as he went on and it mounted to his knees, he
felt that the stain of travel and all weariness was washed from his limbs.
 When all the Company had crossed, they sat and rested and ate a little
food; and Legolas told them tales of Lothlórien that the Elves of Mirkwood
still kept in their hearts, of sunlight and starlight upon the meadows by the
Great River before the world was grey.
 At length a silence fell, and they heard the music of the waterfall
running sweetly in the shadows. Almost Frodo fancied that he could hear a
voice singing, mingled with the sound of the water.
 `Do you hear the voice of Nimrodel? ' asked Legolas. 'I will sing you a
song of the maiden Nimrodel, who bore the same name as the stream beside which
she lived lung ago. It is a fair song in our woodland tongue; but this is how
it runs in the Westron Speech, as some in Rivendell now sing it.' In a soft
voice hardly to be heard amid the rustle of the leaves above them he began:
 An Elven-maid there was of old,
 A shining star by day:
 Her mantle white was hemmed with gold,
 Her shoes of silver-grey.
 A star was bound upon her brows,
 A light was on her hair
 As sun upon the golden boughs
 In Lórien the fair.
 Her hair was long, her limbs were white,
 And fair she was and free;
 And in the wind she went as light
 As leaf of linden-tree.
 Beside the falls of Nimrodel,
 By water clear and cool,
 Her voice as falling silver fell
 Into the shining pool.
 Where now she wanders none can tell,
 In sunlight or in shade;
 For lost of yore was Nimrodel
 And in the mountains strayed.
 The elven-ship in haven grey
 Beneath the mountain-lee
 Awaited her for many a day
 Beside the roaring sea.
 A wind by night in Northern lands
 Arose, and loud it cried,
 And drove the ship from elven-strands
 Across the streaming tide.
 When dawn came dim the land was lost,
 The mountains sinking grey
 Beyond the heaving waves that tossed
 Their plumes of blinding spray.
 Amroth beheld the fading shore
 Now low beyond the swell,
 And cursed the faithless ship that bore
 Him far from Nimrodel.
 Of old he was an Elven-king,
 A lord of tree and glen,
 When golden were the boughs in spring
 In fair Lothlórien.
 From helm to sea they saw him leap,
 As arrow from the string,
 And dive into the water deep,
 As mew upon the wing.
 The wind was in his flowing hair,
 The foam about him shone;
 Afar they saw him strong and fair
 Go riding like a swan.
 But from the West has come no word,
 And on the Hither Shore
 No tidings Elven-folk have heard
 Of Amroth evermore.
 The voice of Legolas faltered, and the song ceased. 'I cannot sing any
more,' he said. 'That is but a part, for I have forgotten much. It is long and
sad, for it tells how sorrow came upon Lothlórien, Lórien of the Blossom, when
the Dwarves awakened evil in the mountains.'
 `But the Dwarves did not make the evil,' said Gimli.
 `I said not so; yet evil came,' answered Legolas sadly. `Then many of the
Elves of Nimrodel's kindred left their dwellings and departed and she was lost
far in the South, in the passes of the White Mountains; and she came not to
the ship where Amroth her lover waited for her. But in the spring when the
wind is in the new leaves the echo of her voice may still be heard by the
falls that bear her name. And when the wind is in the South the voice of
Amroth comes up from the sea; for Nimrodel flows into Silverlode, that Elves
call Celebrant, and Celebrant into Anduin the Great. and Anduin flows into the
Bay of Belfalas whence the Elves of Lórien set sail. But neither Nimrodel nor
Amroth ever came back.
 'It is told that she had a house built in the branches of a tree that
grew near the falls; for that was the custom of the Elves of Lórien, to dwell
in the trees, and maybe it is so still. Therefore they were called the
Galadhrim, the Tree-people. Deep in their forest the trees are very great. The
people of the woods did not delve in the ground like Dwarves, nor build strong
places of stone before the Shadow came.'
 `And even in these latter days dwelling in the trees might be thought
safer than sitting on the ground,' said Gimli. He looked across the stream to
the road that led back to Dimrill Dale, and then up into the roof of dark
boughs above.
 `Your words bring good counsel, Gimli,' said Aragorn. `We cannot build a
house, but tonight we will do as the Galadhrim and seek refuge in the treetops, if we can. We have sat
here beside the road already longer than was
wise.'
 The Company now turned aside from the path, and went into the shadow of
the deeper woods, westward along the mountain-stream away from Silverlode. Not
far from the falls of Nimrodel they found a cluster of trees, some of which
overhung the stream. Their great grey trunks were of mighty girth, but their
height could not be guessed.
 `I will climb up,' said Legolas. `I am at home among trees, by root or
bough, though these trees are of a kind strange to me, save as a name in song.
_Mellyrn_ they are called, and are those that bear the yellow blossom, but I
have never climbed in one. I will see now what is their shape and way of
growth.'
 `Whatever it may be,' said Pippin, `they will be marvellous trees indeed
if they can offer any rest at night, except to birds. I cannot sleep on a
perch! '
 'Then dig a hole in the ground,' said Legolas, `if that is more after the
fashion of your kind. But you must dig swift and deep, if you wish to hide
from Orcs.' He sprang lightly up from the ground and caught a branch that grew
from the trunk high above his head. But even as he swung there for a moment, a
voice spoke suddenly from the tree-shadows above him.
 `_Daro!_' it said in commanding tone, and Legolas dropped back to earth
in surprise and fear. He shrank against the bole of the tree.
 'Stand still! ' he whispered to the others. `Do not move or speak! '
 There was a sound of soft laughter over their heads, and then another
clear voice spoke in an elven-tongue. Frodo could understand little of what
was said, for the speech that the Silvan folk east of the mountains used among
themselves was unlike that of the West. Legolas looked up and answered in the
same language.
 `Who are they, and what do they say? ' asked Merry.
 `They're Elves,' said Sam. `Can't you hear their voices? '
 `Yes, they are Elves,' said Legolas; `and they say that you breathe so
loud that they could shoot you in the dark.' Sam hastily put his hand over his
mouth. 'But they say also that you need have no fear. They have been aware of
us for a long while. They heard my voice across the Nimrodel, and knew that I
was one of their Northern kindred, and therefore they did not hinder our
crossing; and afterwards they heard my song. Now they bid me climb up with
Frodo; for they seem to have had some tidings of him and of our journey. The
others they ask to wait a little and to keep watch at the foot of the tree,
until they have decided what is to be done.'
 Out of the shadows a ladder was let down: it was made of rope, silvergrey and glimmering in the dark,
and though it looked slender it proved strong
enough to bear many men. Legolas ran lightly up, and Frodo followed slowly;
behind came Sam trying not to breathe loudly. The branches of the mallorn-tree
grew out nearly straight from the trunk, and then swept upward; but near the
top the main stem divided into a crown of many boughs, and among these they
found that there had been built a wooden platform, or _flet_ as such things
were called in those days: the Elves called it a _talan_. It was reached by a
round hole in the centre through which the ladder passed.
 When Frodo came at last up on to the flet he found Legolas seated with
three other Elves. They were clad in shadowy-grey, and could not be seen among
the tree-stems, unless they moved suddenly. They stood up, and one of them
uncovered a small lamp that gave out a slender silver beam. He held it up,
looking at Frodo's face, and Sam's. Then he shut off the light again, and
spoke words of welcome in his elven-tongue. Frodo spoke haltingly in return.
 `Welcome!' the Elf then said again in the Common Language, speaking
slowly. 'We seldom use any tongue but our own; for we dwell now in the heart
of the forest, and do not willingly have dealings with any other folk. Even
our own kindred in the North are sundered from us. But there are some of us
still who go abroad for the gathering of news and the watching of our enemies,
and they speak the languages of other lands. I am one. Haldir is my name. My
brothers, Rúmil and Orophin, speak little of your tongue.
 `But we have heard rumours of your coming, for the messengers of Elrond
passed by Lórien on their way home up the Dimrill Stair. We had not heard of
hobbits, or halflings, for many a long year, and did not know that any yet
dwelt in Middle-earth. You do not look evil! And since you come with an Elf of
our kindred, we are willing to befriend you, as Elrond asked; though it is not
our custom to lead strangers through our land. But you must stay here tonight.
How many are you? '
 `Eight,' said Legolas. `Myself, four hobbits; and two men, one of whom,
Aragorn, is an Elf-friend of the folk of Westernesse.'
 `The name of Aragorn son of Arathorn is known in Lórien,' said Haldir,
`and he has the favour of the Lady. All then is well. But you have yet spoken
only of seven.'
 `The eighth is a dwarf,' said Legolas.
 `A dwarf! ' said Haldir. `That is not well. We have not had dealings with
the Dwarves since the Dark Days. They are not permitted in our land. I cannot
allow him to pass.'
 `But he is from the Lonely Mountain, one of Dáin's trusty people, and
friendly to Elrond,' said Frodo. `Elrond himself chose him to be one of our
companions, and he has been brave and faithful.'
 The Elves spoke together in soft voices, and questioned Legolas in their
own tongue. 'Very good,' said Haldir at last. `We will do this, though it is
against our liking. If Aragorn and Legolas will guard him, and answer for him,
he shall pass; but he must go blindfold through Lothlórien.
 `But now we must debate no longer. Your folk must not remain on the
ground. We have been keeping watch on the rivers, ever since we saw a great
troop of Orcs going north toward Moria, along the skirts of the mountains,
many days ago. Wolves are howling on the wood's borders. If you have indeed
come from Moria, the peril cannot be far behind. Tomorrow early you must go
on.
 'The four hobbits shall climb up here and stay with us-we do not fear
them! There is another _talan_ in the next tree. There the others must take
refuge. You, Legolas, must answer to us for them. Call us, if anything is
amiss! And have an eye on that dwarf!'
 Legolas at once went down the ladder to take Haldir's message; and soon
afterwards Merry and Pippin clambered up on to the high flet. They were out of
breath and seemed rather scared.
 `There!' said Merry panting. `We have lugged up your blankets as well as
our own. Strider has hidden all the rest of the baggage in a deep drift of
leaves.'
 `You had no need of your burdens,' said Haldir. `It is cold in the treetops in winter, though the wind
tonight is in the South; but we have food and
drink to give you that will drive away the night-chill, and we have skins and
cloaks to spare.'
 The hobbits accepted this second (and far better) supper very gladly.
Then they wrapped themselves warmly, not only in the fur-cloaks of the Elves,
but in their own blankets as well, and tried to go to sleep. But weary as they
were only Sam found that easy to do. Hobbits do not like heights, and do not
sleep upstairs, even when they have any stairs. The flet was not at all to
their liking as a bedroom. It had no walls. not even a rail; only on one side
was there a light plaited screen, which could be moved and fixed in different
places according to the wind.
 Pippin went on talking for a while. `I hope, if I do go to sleep in this
bed-loft, that I shan't roll off,' he said.
 `Once I do get to sleep,' said Sam, 'i shall go on sleeping, whether I
roll off or no. And the less said, the sooner I'll drop off, if you take my
meaning.'
 Frodo lay for some time awake, and looked up at the stars glinting
through the pale roof of quivering leaves. Sam was snoring at his side long
before he himself closed his eyes. He could dimly see the grey forms of two
elves sitting motionless with their arms about their knees, speaking in
whispers. The other had gone down to take up his watch on one of the lower
branches. At last lulled by the wind in the boughs above, and the sweet murmur
of the falls of Nimrodel below, Frodo fell asleep with the song of Legolas
running in his mind.
 Late in the night he awoke. The other hobbits were asleep. The Elves were
gone. The sickle Moon was gleaming dimly among the leaves. The wind was still.
A little way off he heard a harsh laugh and the tread of many feet on the
ground below. There was a ring of metal. The sounds died slowly away, and
seemed to go southward, on into the wood.
 A head appeared suddenly through the hole in the flet. Frodo sat up in
alarm and saw that it was a grey-hooded Elf. He looked towards the hobbits.
 `What is it? ' said Frodo.
 `_Yrch!_' said the Elf in a hissing whisper, and cast on to the flet the
rope-ladder rolled up.
 'Orcs! ' said Frodo. `What are they doing? ' But the Elf had gone.
 There were no more sounds. Even the leaves were silent, and the very
falls seemed to be hushed. Frodo sat and shivered in his wraps. He was
thankful that they had not been caught on the ground; but he felt that the
trees offered little protection, except concealment. Orcs were as keen as
hounds on a scent, it was said, but they could also climb. He drew out Sting:
it flashed and glittered like a blue flame and then slowly faded again and
grew dull. In spite of the fading of his sword the feeling of immediate danger
did not leave Frodo, rather it grew stronger. He got up and crawled to the
opening and peered down. He was almost certain that he could hear stealthy
movements at the tree's foot far below.
 Not Elves; for the woodland folk were altogether noiseless in their
movements. Then he heard faintly a sound like sniffing: and something seemed
to be scrabbling on the bark of the tree-trunk. He stared down into the dark,
holding his breath.
 Something was now climbing slowly, and its breath came like a soft
hissing through closed teeth. Then coming up, close to the stem, Frodo saw two
pale eyes. They stopped and gazed upward unwinking. Suddenly they turned away,
and a shadowy figure slipped round the trunk of the tree and vanished.
 Immediately afterwards Haldir came climbing swiftly up through the
branches. `There was something in this tree that I have never seen before,' he
said. `It was not an orc. It fled as soon as I touched the tree-stem. It
seemed to be wary, and to have some skill in trees, or I might have thought
that it was one of you hobbits.
 'I did not shoot, for I dared not arouse any cries: we cannot risk
battle. A strong company of Orcs has passed. They crossed the Nimrodel-curse
their foul feet in its clean water!-and went on down the old road beside the
river. They seemed to pick up some scent, and they searched the ground for a
while near the place where you halted. The three of us could not challenge a
hundred, so we went ahead and spoke with feigned voices, leading them on into
the wood.
 `Orophin has now gone in haste back to our dwellings to warn our people.
None of the Orcs will ever return out of Lórien. And there will be many Elves
hidden on the northern border before another night falls. But you must take
the road south as soon as it is fully light.'
 Day came pale from the East. As the light grew it filtered through the
yellow leaves of the mallorn, and it seemed to the hobbits that the early sun
of a cool summer's morning was shining. Pale-blue sky peeped among the moving
branches. Looking through an opening on the south side of the flet Frodo saw
all the valley of the Silverlode lying like a sea of fallow gold tossing
gently in the breeze.
 The morning was still young and cold when the Company set out again,
guided now by Haldir and his brother Rúmil. `Farewell, sweet Nimrodel! ' cried
Legolas. Frodo looked back and caught a gleam of white foam among the grey
tree-stems. `Farewell,' he said. It seemed to him that he would never hear
again a running water so beautiful, for ever blending its innumerable notes in
an endless changeful music.
 They went back to the path that still went on along the west side of the
Silverlode, and for some way they followed it southward. There were the prints
of orc-feet in the earth. But soon Haldir turned aside into the trees and
halted on the bank of the river under their shadows.
 `There is one of my people yonder across the stream,' he said `though you
may not see him.' He gave a call like the low whistle of a bird, and out of a
thicket of young trees an Elf stepped, clad in grey, but with his hood thrown
back; his hair glinted like gold in the morning sun. Haldir skilfully cast
over the stream a coil of grey rope, and he caught it and bound the end about
a tree near the bank.
 `Celebrant is already a strong stream here, as you see,' said Haldir 'and
it runs both swift and deep, and is very cold. We do not set foot in it so far
north, unless we must. But in these days of watchfulness we do not make
bridges. This is how we cross! Follow me!' He made his end of the rope fast
about another tree, and then ran lightly along it, over the river and back
again, as if he were on a road.
 `I can walk this path,' said Legolas; `but the others have not this
skill. Must they swim?'
 `No!' said Haldir. `We have two more ropes. We will fasten them above the
other, one shoulder-high, and another half-high, and holding these the
strangers should be able to cross with care.'
 When this slender bridge had been made, the Company passed over, some
cautiously and slowly, others more easily. Of the hobbits Pippin proved the
best for he was sure-footed, and he walked over quickly, holding only with one
hand; but he kept his eyes on the bank ahead and did not look down. Sam
shuffled along, clutching hard, and looking down into the pale eddying water
as if it was a chasm in the mountains.
 He breathed with relief when he was safely across. `Live and learn! as my
gaffer used to say. Though he was thinking of gardening, not of roosting like
a bird, nor of trying to walk like a spider. Not even my uncle Andy ever did a
trick like that! '
 When at length all the Company was gathered on the east bank of the
Silverlode, the Elves untied the ropes and coiled two of them. Rúmil, who had
remained on the other side, drew back the last one, slung it on his shoulder,
and with a wave of his hand went away, back to Nimrodel to keep watch.
 `Now, friends,' said Haldir, `you have entered the Naith of Lórien or the
Gore, as you would say, for it is the land that lies like a spear-head between
the arms of Silverlode and Anduin the Great. We allow no strangers to spy out
the secrets of the Naith. Few indeed are permitted even to set foot there.
 `As was agreed, I shall here blindfold the eyes of Gimli the Dwarf. The
other may walk free for a while, until we come nearer to our dwellings, down
in Egladil, in the Angle between the waters.'
 This was not at all to the liking of Gimli. `The agreement was made
without my consent,' he said. `I will not walk blindfold, like a beggar or a
prisoner. And I am no spy. My folk have never had dealings with any of the
servants of the Enemy. Neither have we done harm to the Elves. I am no more
likely to betray you than Legolas, or any other of my companions.'
 'I do not doubt you,' said Haldir. 'Yet this is our law. I am not the
master of the law, and cannot set it aside. I have done much in letting you
set foot over Celebrant.'
 Gimli was obstinate. He planted his feet firmly apart, and laid his hand
upon the haft of his axe. 'I will go forward free,' he said, 'or I will go
back and seek my own land, where I am known to be true of word, though I
perish alone in the wilderness.'
 `You cannot go back,' said Haldir sternly. 'Now you have come thus far,
you must be brought before the Lord and the Lady. They shall judge you, to
hold you or to give you leave, as they will. You cannot cross the rivers
again, and behind you there are now secret sentinels that you cannot pass. You
would be slain before you saw them.'
 Gimli drew his axe from his belt. Haldir and his companion bent their
bows. 'A plague on Dwarves and their stiff necks! ' said Legolas.
 'Come!' said Aragorn. `If I am still to lead this Company, you must do as
I bid. It is hard upon the Dwarf to be thus singled out. We will all be
blindfold, even Legolas. That will be best, though it will make the journey
slow and dull.'
 Gimli laughed suddenly. `A merry troop of fools we shall look! Will
Haldir lead us all on a string, like many blind beggars with one dog? But I
will be content, if only Legolas here shares my blindness.'
 `I am an Elf and a kinsman here,' said Legolas, becoming angry in his
turn.
 `Now let us cry: "a plague on the stiff necks of Elves!"' said Aragorn.
`But the Company shall all fare alike. Come, bind our eyes Haldir! '
 `I shall claim full amends for every fall and stubbed toe, if you do not
lead us well,' said Gimli as they bound a cloth about his eyes.
 'You will have no claim,' said Haldir. `I shall lead you well, and the
paths are smooth and straight.'
 `Alas for the folly of these days! ' said Legolas. 'Here all are enemies
of the one Enemy, and yet I must walk blind, while the sun is merry in the
woodland under leaves of gold! '
 `Folly it may seem,' said Haldir. 'Indeed in nothing is the power of the
Dark Lord more clearly shown than in the estrangement that divides all those
who still oppose him. Yet so little faith and trust do we find now in the
world beyond Lothlórien, unless maybe in Rivendell, that we dare not by our
own trust endanger our land. We live now upon an island amid many perils, and
our hands are more often upon the bowstring than upon the harp.
 `The rivers long defended us, but they are a sure guard no more for the
Shadow has crept northward all about us. Some speak of departing, yet for that
it already seems too late. The mountains to the west are growing evil; to the
east the lands are waste, and full of Sauron's creatures; and it is rumoured
that we cannot now safely pass southward through Rohan, and the mouths of the
Great River are watched by the Enemy. Even if we could come to the shores of
the Sea, we should find no longer any shelter there. It is said that there are
still havens of. the High Elves, but they are far north and west, beyond the
land of the Halflings. But where that may be, though the Lord and Lady may
know, I do not.'
 `You ought at least to guess, since you have seen us,' said Merry. `There
are Elf-havens west of my land, the Shire where Hobbits live.'
 `Happy folk are Hobbits to dwell near the shores of the sea! ' said
Haldir. 'It is long indeed since any of my folk have looked on it, yet still
we remember it in song. Tell me of these havens as we walk.'
 `I cannot,' said Merry. `I have never seen them. I have never been out of
my own land before. And if I had known what the world outside was like. I
don't think I should have had the heart to leave it.'
 `Not even to see fair Lothlórien? ' said Haldir. 'The world is indeed
full of peril, and in it there are many dark places; but still there is much
that is fair, and though in all lands love is now mingled with grief, it grows
perhaps the greater.
 `Some there are among us who sing that the Shadow will draw back and
peace shall come again. Yet I do not believe that the world about us will ever
again be as it was of old, or the light of the Sun as it was aforetime. For
the Elves, I fear, it will prove at best a truce, in which they may pass to
the Sea unhindered and leave the Middle-earth for ever. Alas for Lothlórien
that I love! It would be a poor life in a land where no mallorn grew. But if
there are mallorn-trees beyond the Great Sea, none have reported it.'
 As they spoke thus, the Company filed slowly along the paths in the wood,
led by Haldir, while the other Elf walked behind. They felt the ground beneath
their feet smooth and soft, and after a while they walked more freely, without
fear of hurt or fall. Being deprived of sight, Frodo found his hearing and
other senses sharpened. He could smell the trees and the trodden grass. He
could hear many different notes in the rustle of the leaves overhead, the
river murmuring away on his right, and the thin clear voices of birds in the
sky. He felt the sun upon his face and hands when they passed through an open
glade.
 As soon as he set foot upon the far bank of Silverlode a strange feeling
had come upon him, and it deepened as he walked on into the Naith: it seemed
to him that he had stepped over a bridge of time into a corner of the Elder
Days, and was -now walking in a world that was no more. In Rivendell there was
memory of ancient things; in Lórien the ancient things still lived on in the
waking world. Evil had been seen and heard there, sorrow had been known; the
Elves feared and distrusted the world outside: wolves were howling on the
wood's borders: but on the land of Lórien no shadow lay.
 All that day the Company marched on, until they felt the cool evening
come and heard the early night-wind whispering among many leaves. Then they
rested and slept without fear upon the ground; for their guides would not
permit them to unbind their eyes, and they could not climb. In the morning
they went on again, walking without haste. At noon they halted, and Frodo was
aware that they had passed out under the shining Sun. Suddenly he heard the
sound of many voices all around him.
 A marching host of Elves had come up silently: they were hastening toward
the northern borders to guard against any attack from Moria; and they brought
news, some of which Haldir reported. The marauding orcs had been waylaid and
almost all destroyed; the remnant had fled westward towards the mountains, and
were being pursued. A strange creature also had been seen, running with bent
back and with hands near the ground, like a beast and yet not of beast-shape.
It had eluded capture, and they had not shot it, not knowing whether it was
good or ill, and it had vanished down the Silverlode southward.
 `Also,' said Haldir, `they bring me a message from the Lord and Lady of
the Galadhrim. You are all to walk free, even the dwarf Gimli. It seems that
the Lady knows who and what is each member of your Company. New messages have
come from Rivendell perhaps.'
 He removed the bandage first from Gimli's eyes. 'Your pardon! ' he said,
bowing low. `Look on us now with friendly eyes! Look and be glad, for you are
the first dwarf to behold the trees of the Naith of Lórien since Durin's Day!
'
 When his eyes were in turn uncovered, Frodo looked up and caught his
breath. They were standing in an open space. To the left stood a great mound,
covered with a sward of grass as green as Spring-time in the Elder Days. Upon
it, as a double crown, grew two circles of trees: the outer had bark of snowy
white, and were leafless but beautiful in their shapely nakedness; the inner
were mallorn-trees of great height, still arrayed in pale gold. High amid the
branches of a towering tree that stood in the centre of all there gleamed a
white flet. At the feet of the trees, and all about the green hillsides the
grass was studded with small golden flowers shaped like stars. Among them,
nodding on slender stalks, were other flowers, white and palest green: they
glimmered as a mist amid the rich hue of the grass. Over all the sky was blue,
and the sun of afternoon glowed upon the hill and cast long green shadows
beneath the trees.
 'Behold! You are come to Cerin Amroth,' said Haldir. `For this is the
heart of the ancient realm as it was long ago, and here is the mound of
Amroth, where in happier days his high house was built. Here ever bloom the
winter flowers in the unfading grass: the yellow _elanor_, and the pale
_niphredil_. Here we will stay awhile, and come to the city of the Galadhrim
at dusk.'
 The others cast themselves down upon the fragrant grass, but Frodo stood
awhile still lost in wonder. It seemed to him that he had stepped through a
high window that looked on a vanished world. A light was upon it for which his
language had no name. All that he saw was shapely, but the shapes seemed at
once clear cut, as if they had been first conceived and drawn at the
uncovering of his eyes, and ancient as if they had endured for ever. He saw no
colour but those he knew, gold and white and blue and green, but they were
fresh and poignant, as if he had at that moment first perceived them and made
for them names new and wonderful. In winter here no heart could mourn for
summer or for spring. No blemish or sickness or deformity could be seen in
anything that grew upon the earth. On the land of Lórien there was no stain.
 He turned and saw that Sam was now standing beside him, looking round
with a puzzled expression, and rubbing his eyes as if he was not sure that he
was awake. `It's sunlight and bright day, right enough,' he said. `I thought
that Elves were all for moon and stars: but this is more elvish than anything
I ever heard tell of. I feel as if I was _inside_ a song. if you take my
meaning.'
 Haldir looked at them, and he seemed indeed to take the meaning of both
thought and word. He smiled. `You feel the power of the Lady of the
Galadhrim,' he said. `Would it please you to climb with me up Cerin Amroth? '
 They followed him as he stepped lightly up the grass-clad slopes. Though
he walked and breathed, and about him living leaves and flowers were stirred
by the same cool wind as fanned his face, Frodo felt that he was in a timeless
land that did not fade or change or fall into forgetfulness. When he had gone
and passed again into the outer world, still Frodo the wanderer from the Shire
would walk there, upon the grass among _elanor_ and _niphredil_ in fair
Lothlórien.
 They entered the circle of white trees. As they did so the South Wind
blew upon Cerin Amroth and sighed among the branches. Frodo stood still,
hearing far off_ great seas upon beaches that had long ago been washed away,
and sea-birds crying whose race had perished from the earth.
 Haldir had gone on and was now climbing to the high flet. As Frodo
prepared to follow him, he laid his hand upon the tree beside the ladder:
never before had he been so suddenly and so keenly aware of the feel and
texture of a tree's skin and of the life within it. He felt a delight in wood
and the touch of it, neither as forester nor as carpenter; it was the delight
of the living tree itself.
 As he stepped out at last upon the lofty platform, Haldir took his hand
and turned him toward the South. `Look this way first! ' he said.
 Frodo looked and saw, still at some distance, a hill of many mighty
trees, or a city of green towers: which it was he could not tell. Out of it,
it seemed to him that the power and light came that held all the land in sway.
He longed suddenly to fly like a bird to rest in the green city. Then he
looked eastward and saw all the land of Lórien running down to the pale gleam
of Anduin, the Great River. He lifted his eyes across the river and all the
light went out, and he was back again in the world he knew. Beyond the river
the land appeared flat and empty, formless and vague, until far away it rose
again like a wall, dark and drear. The sun that lay on Lothlórien had no power
to enlighten the shadow of that distant height.
 `There lies the fastness of Southern Mirkwood,' said Haldir. `It is clad
in a forest of dark fir, where the trees strive one against another and their
branches rot and wither. In the midst upon a stony height stands Dol Guldur,
where long the hidden Enemy had his dwelling. We fear that now it is inhabited
again, and with power sevenfold. A black cloud lies often over it of late. In
this high place you may see the two powers that are opposed one to another;
and ever they strive now in thought, but whereas the light perceives the very
heart of the darkness, its own secret has not been discovered. Not yet.' He
turned and climbed swiftly down, and they followed him.
 At the hill's foot Frodo found Aragorn, standing still and silent as a
tree; but in his hand was a small golden bloom of elanor, and a light was in
his eyes. He was wrapped in some fair memory: and as Frodo looked at him he
knew that he beheld things as they once had been in this same place. For the
grim years were removed from the face of Aragorn, and he seemed clothed in
white, a young lord tall and fair; and he spoke words in the Elvish tongue to
one whom Frodo could not see_. Arwen vanimelda, namárië!_ he said, and then he
drew a breath, and returning out of his thought he looked at Frodo and smiled.
 `Here is the heart of Elvendom on earth,' he said, `and here my heart
dwells ever, unless there be a light beyond the dark roads that we still must
tread, you and I. Come with me! ' And taking Frodo's hand in his, he left the
hill of Cerin Amroth and came there never again as living man. 
